
Quizzable
1,455 words | What are "Quizzable" words?

abandon

abandon: When you act with abandon, you give in to the impulse of the moment and behave in a wild, uncontrolled way.

abase

abase: If you abase yourself, people respect you less because you behave in a way that shows that someone else has complete power over you.

abash

abash: When you abash someone, you make them feel uncomfortable, ashamed, embarrassed, or inferior.

abate

abate: When something bad or painful abates, it becomes less strong or severe.

abdicate

abdicate: If someone abdicates, they give up their responsibility for something, such as a king's transfer of power when he gives up his throne.

aberrant

aberrant: When something is aberrant, it is unusual, not socially acceptable, or a departure from the norm.

abet

abet: When you abet someone, you help them in a criminal or illegal act.

abeyance

abeyance: If something is in abeyance, it has been put on hold and is not proceeding or being used at the present time.

abhor

abhor: If you abhor something, you dislike it very much, usually because you think it's immoral.

abject

abject: The word abject emphasizes a very bad situation or quality, thereby making it even worse.

abjure

abjure: If you abjure a belief or a way of behaving, you state publicly that you will give it up or reject it.

ablation

ablation: The process of ablation is the removal of diseased organs or harmful substances from the body, often through surgical procedure.

ablution

ablution: When you perform your ablutions, you wash yourself; this can be part of a religious ceremony as well.

abnegation

abnegation: Your abnegation of something is your giving up your rights or claim to it, even though it might not be in your best interest to do so.

abolish

abolish: If someone in authority abolishes a law or practice, they formally put an end to it.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 23, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

abominate

abominate: If you abominate something, you hate it because you think it is extremely wrong and unacceptable.

abortive

abortive: An abortive attempt or action is cut short before it is finished; hence, it is unsuccessful.

abrasive

abrasive: Someone who has an abrasive manner is unkind and rude, wearing away at you in an irritating fashion.

abridge

abridge: If you abridge a book or play, you make it shorter by making cuts to the original.

abrogate

abrogate: To abrogate an act is to end it by official and sometimes legal means.

abscond

abscond: When you abscond, you leave suddenly from a place that has imprisoned or persecuted you, or you leave from a place with something that doesn't belong to you.

absolve

absolve: When you absolve someone, you publicly and formally say that they are not guilty or responsible for any wrongdoing.

abstemious

abstemious: Someone who is abstemious avoids doing too much of something enjoyable, such as eating or drinking; rather, they consume in a moderate fashion.

abstinence

abstinence: Abstinence is the practice of keeping away from or avoiding something you enjoy—such as the physical pleasures of excessive food and drink—usually for health or religious reasons.

abstruse

abstruse: You can describe something as abstruse if you find it highly complicated and difficult to understand.

abysmal

abysmal: A situation or condition that is abysmal is extremely bad or of wretched quality.

accede

accede: When you accede to a demand or proposal, you agree to it, especially after first disagreeing with it.

accentuate

accentuate: To accentuate something is to emphasize it or make it more noticeable.

acclimate

acclimate: When you acclimate yourself to a new situation or environment, you adapt and get used to it.

accost

accost: You accost a stranger when you move towards them and speak in an unpleasant or threatening way.

accoutrement

accoutrement: Accoutrements are the things that you take with you when you travel or when you take part in a particular activity.

accretion

accretion: Accretion is the slow, gradual process by which new things are added and something gets bigger.

acerbic

acerbic: If you take an acerbic tone with someone, you are criticizing them in a clever but critical and mean way.

acme

acme: The acme of something is its highest point of achievement or excellence.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 27, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

acolyte

acolyte: An acolyte is someone who serves a leader as a devoted assistant or believes in the leader's ideas.

acquiesce

acquiesce: If you acquiesce to something, you allow it to happen by doing what someone wants without putting up a struggle or voicing your own concerns.

acquisitive

acquisitive: When you are acquisitive, you are driven to pursue and own wealth and possessions—often in a greedy fashion.

acrid

acrid: An acrid smell or taste is strong, unpleasant, and stings your nose or throat.

acrimonious

acrimonious: An acrimonious meeting or discussion is bitter, resentful, and filled with angry contention.

acuity

acuity: Acuity is sharpness or clearness of vision, hearing, or thought.

acumen

acumen: Acumen is the ability to make quick decisions and keen, precise judgments.

adage

adage: An adage is an inherited saying or phrase that has been historically used to express a common experience.

addendum

addendum: An addendum is an additional section added to the end of a book, document, or speech that gives more information.

addle

addle: If someone is addled by something, they are confused by it and unable to think properly.

adduce

adduce: When you adduce, you give facts and examples in order to prove that something is true.

adept

adept: When you are adept at something, you are very good, skillful, or talented at it.

adherent

adherent: An adherent is a supporter or follower of a leader or a cause.

adjudicate

adjudicate: If you adjudicate a competition or dispute, you officially decide who is right or what should be done concerning any difficulties that may arise.

adjunct

adjunct: An adjunct is something that is added to or joined to something else that is larger or more important.

adjure

adjure: When you adjure someone to do something, you persuade, eagerly appeal, or solemnly order them to do it.

admonish

admonish: When you admonish someone, you tell them gently but with seriousness that they have done something wrong; you usually caution and advise them not to do it again.

adroit

adroit: Someone who is adroit is skillful and clever, especially in thought, behavior, or action.

adulation

adulation: Adulation is praise and admiration for someone that includes more than they deserve, usually for the purposes of flattery.

adulterate

adulterate: If you adulterate something, you lessen its quality by adding inferior ingredients or elements to it.

adumbrate

adumbrate: To adumbrate is to describe something incompletely or to suggest future events based on limited current knowledge.

adventitious

adventitious: Something that happens unexpectedly and by chance that is not inherent or natural to a given item or situation is adventitious, such as a root appearing in an unusual place on a plant.

advocate

advocate: When you advocate a plan or action, you publicly push for implementing it.

aegis

aegis: Something done under the aegis of an organization or person is done with their support, backing, and protection.

aesthetic

aesthetic: The word aesthetic is used to talk about art, beauty, the study of beauty, and the appreciation of beautiful things.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 27, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

affable

affable: An affable person is pleasant, friendly, and easy to talk to.

affiliation

affiliation: If you have an affiliation with a group or another person, you are officially involved or connected with them.

affliction

affliction: An affliction is something that causes pain and mental suffering, especially a medical condition.

affluence

affluence: Affluence is the state of having a lot of money and many possessions, granting one a high economic standard of living.

affront

affront: You affront someone by openly and intentionally offending or insulting him.

aficionado

aficionado: If someone is an aficionado of something, such as soccer, they like it and know a lot about it; therefore, they are a true fan of it.

agglomerate

agglomerate: To agglomerate a group of things is to gather them together without any noticeable order.

aggrandize

aggrandize: To aggrandize someone means to make them seem richer, more powerful, and more important than they really are.

aggregate

aggregate: An aggregate is the final or sum total after many different amounts or scores have been added together.

You checked "I Know This" on May 18, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

agnostic

agnostic: An agnostic is a person who believes that it is impossible to know conclusively whether or not God exists; an agnostic can be doubtful about other things as well.

agrarian

agrarian: The adjective agrarian is used to describe something that is related to farmland or the economy that is concerned with agriculture.

alacrity

alacrity: If you do something with alacrity, you do it eagerly and quickly.

aliment

aliment: Aliment is something, usually food, that feeds, nourishes, or supports someone or something else.

allay

allay: You allay someone's fear or concern by making them feel less afraid or worried.

allegorical

allegorical: An allegorical poem or story employs allegory, that is, a literary device that uses literal events and characters to represent abstract ideas or deeper meanings.

alleviate

alleviate: If you alleviate pain or suffering, you make it less intense or severe.

alliteration

alliteration: Alliteration is a device used in speech or writing in which several consecutive words all begin with the same sound or letter, the latter usually a consonant.

allude

allude: When you allude to something or someone, often events or characters from literature or history, you refer to them in an indirect way.

altercation

altercation: An altercation is a noisy disagreement or heated argument.

altruistic

altruistic: If your behavior or manner is altruistic, you show you care more about other people and their interests than you care about yourself.

amalgamate

amalgamate: When two or more things, such as organizations, amalgamate, they combine to become one large thing.

You checked "I Know This" on May 2, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

ambidextrous

ambidextrous: When a person is ambidextrous, they can use their left or right hand with equal skill.

ambient

ambient: Ambient sound, light, and temperature are those parts of the environment that surround you.

ambiguous

ambiguous: If you describe something as ambiguous, you mean that it is unclear or confusing because it can be understood in multiple ways.

ambivalent

ambivalent: If you are ambivalent about something, you are uncertain whether you like it or what you should do about it.

ambulatory

ambulatory: Ambulatory activities involve walking or moving around.

ameliorate

ameliorate: When you ameliorate a bad condition or situation, you make it better in some way.

amenable

amenable: If you are amenable to doing something, you willingly accept it without arguing.

amenity

amenity: Amenities are things that make a place comfortable or easy to live in, such as hot water, updated bathrooms, and sports facilities.

amity

amity: Amity is a peaceful friendship between two parties, particularly between two countries.

amorphous

amorphous: Something that is amorphous has no clear shape, boundaries, or structure.

anachronism

anachronism: An anachronism is something that is out of place because it is set in the wrong time period.

analogous

analogous: If one thing is analogous to another, a comparison can be made between the two because they are similar in some way.

anarchy

anarchy: A state of anarchy occurs when there is no organization or order in a nation or country, especially when no effective government exists.

anathema

anathema: If something is anathema to you, such as a cursed object or idea, you very strongly dislike it or even hate it.

ancillary

ancillary: When something is ancillary to something else, such as a workbook to a textbook, it supports it but is less important than that which it supports.

angst

angst: Angst is a strong feeling of anxiety, worry, and unhappiness, especially about a current or future situation.

animus

animus: If you have animus against someone, you have a strong feeling of dislike or hatred towards them, often without a good reason or based upon your personal prejudices.

annular

annular: A thing shaped like a ring is annular, such as a doughnut or other circular object with a hole in its center.

annulment

annulment: The annulment of a contract or marriage is an official declaration that it is invalid, at which point it no longer has legal authority.

anodyne

anodyne: An anodyne is a medicine that soothes or relieves pain.

anoint

anoint: If you anoint someone, you put oil on a part of their body, usually as part of a religious ceremony.

anomaly

anomaly: If something is an anomaly, it is different from what is usual or expected; hence, it is highly noticeable.

antagonist

antagonist: Your antagonist is an opponent in a competition or battle.

antecedent

antecedent: An antecedent of something, such as an event or organization, has happened or existed before it and can be similar to it.

antediluvian

antediluvian: Something antediluvian is so old or old-fashioned that it seems to belong to a much earlier period in history.

antipathy

antipathy: Antipathy is a strong feeling of dislike or hostility towards someone or something.

antipodal

antipodal: Two points or places are antipodal if they are directly opposite each other, such as the north and south poles; likewise, ideas can be antipodal if they are direct opposites.

antiquated

antiquated: Something antiquated is old-fashioned and not suitable for modern needs or conditions.

antithesis

antithesis: The antithesis of something is its opposite.

apathy

apathy: Apathy is a lack of interest or unenthusiastic involvement in an activity; there is no effort to change or improve it at all.

apex

apex: The apex of anything, such as an organization or system, is its highest part or most important position.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 25, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

aphorism

aphorism: An aphorism is a short, witty statement that contains a wise idea.

aplomb

aplomb: If you deal with a difficult situation with aplomb, you deal with it in a confident and skillful way.

apocryphal

apocryphal: An apocryphal story is widely known but probably not true.

apogee

apogee: The apogee of something is its highest or greatest point, especially in reference to a culture or career.

apostate

apostate: An apostate has abandoned their religious faith, political party, or devotional cause.

apotheosis

apotheosis: The best or perfect example of something is its apotheosis; likewise, this word can be used to indicate the best or highest point in someone's life or job.

appellation

appellation: An appellation is a name or title given to a person, place, or thing.

apportion

apportion: When you apportion something, such as blame or money, you decide how it should be shared among various people.

apposite

apposite: Something that is apposite is relevant or suitable to what is happening or being discussed.

apprise

apprise: When you are apprised of something, you are given information about it.

approbation

approbation: Approbation is official praise or approval of something.

appropriate

appropriate: If you appropriate something that does not belong to you, you take it for yourself without the right to do so.

appurtenance

appurtenance: An appurtenance is a supporting feature, form of equipment, or item associated with a particular activity.

apropos

apropos: When something is apropos, it is fitting to the moment or occasion.

aquiline

aquiline: An aquiline feature, such as a nose or profile, is large, thin, and curved like the beak of an eagle.

arbitrary

arbitrary: If you describe a decision, rule, or plan as arbitrary, you think that it has been decided without any thought, principle, or system to guide it; therefore, it can seem unfair.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 29, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

arboreal

arboreal: The adjective arboreal refers to trees or living in trees.

arcane

arcane: Something that is arcane is mysterious and secret, known and understood by only a few people.

arch

arch: To be arch is to be full of mischief, sneakiness, or playful cunning.

archaic

archaic: Something that is archaic is out of date or not currently used anymore because it is no longer considered useful or efficient.

archetype

archetype: An archetype is a perfect or typical example of something because it has the most important qualities that belong to that type of thing; it can also describe essential qualities common to a particular class of things.

archipelago

archipelago: An archipelago is a large group of islands, sometimes highly scattered.

ardor

ardor: When you have ardor for something, you have an intense feeling of love, excitement, and admiration for it.

arduous

arduous: Something that is arduous is extremely difficult; hence, it involves a lot of effort.

argot

argot: An argot is a special language or set of expressions used by a particular group of people that those outside the group find hard to understand.

arraign

arraign: When you arraign someone, you make them come to court and answer criminal charges made against them.

arrogate

arrogate: When you arrogate something, such as a position or privilege, you take it even though you don't have the legal right to it.

articulate

articulate: If you describe someone as articulate, you mean that they are able to express their thoughts, arguments, and ideas clearly and effectively.

artifact

artifact: An artifact is a weapon, tool, or piece of art that is created by human beings which is historically and culturally interesting.

artifice

artifice: When you employ artifice, you use clever tricks and cunning to deceive someone.

asperity

asperity: Asperity is a sharpness or harshness of tone or manner; it can also indicate severity of a climate.

aspersion

aspersion: An aspersion is an unkind remark or unfair judgment attacking someone's character or reputation.

aspirate

aspirate: When you aspirate something, you draw out fluids by means of suction or you draw in air by inhaling it.

assay

assay: To assay something, such as a substance, is to analyze the chemicals present in it; it can also refer to putting something to the test.

assiduous

assiduous: An assiduous person works hard to ensure that something is done properly and completely.

assignation

assignation: An assignation is a secret meeting between two people who are usually lovers.

assimilate

assimilate: When you assimilate an idea, you completely understand it; likewise, when someone is assimilated into a new place, they become part of it by understanding what it is all about and by being accepted by others who live there.

assuage

assuage: When you assuage an unpleasant feeling, you make it less painful or severe, thereby calming it.

astringent

astringent: When you are astringent towards someone, you speak to or write about them in a critical and hurtful manner.

astute

astute: When you describe someone as astute, you think they quickly understand situations or behavior and use it to their advantage.

atavism

atavism: Atavism is the reappearance of a genetic feature that has been missing for generations; it can also refer to a manner or style that resurfaces after a period of absence.

atrophy

atrophy: Atrophy is a process by which parts of the body, such as muscles and organs, lessen in size or weaken in strength due to internal nerve damage, poor nutrition, or aging.

attenuate

attenuate: When something attenuates, it lessens in size or intensity; it becomes thin or weakened.

attrition

attrition: Attrition is the process of gradually decreasing the strength of something (such as an enemy force) by continually attacking it.

audacious

audacious: An audacious person acts with great daring and sometimes reckless bravery—despite risks and warnings from other people—in order to achieve something.

augment

augment: To augment something is to increase its value or effectiveness by adding something to it.

augury

augury: Augury is the process or art of reading omens about the future through specific ceremonies.

august

august: Someone or something that is august is impressive, dignified, and highly respected.

auspicious

auspicious: The adjective auspicious describes a positive beginning of something, such as a new business, or a certain time that looks to have a good chance of success or prosperity.

austere

austere: Something austere is simple and plain in its style; an austere person is strict and severe with themselves.

autocratic

autocratic: An autocratic person rules with complete power; consequently, they make decisions and give orders to people without asking them for their opinion or advice.

autonomous

autonomous: An autonomous person makes their own decisions without being influenced by anyone else; an autonomous country or organization is independent and has the power to govern itself.

avarice

avarice: Avarice is the extremely strong desire to have a lot of money and possessions.

aver

aver: If you aver that something is the case, you say firmly and strongly that you believe it is true.

avocation

avocation: An avocation is an activity, such as a hobby, that you do because you are interested in it.

awry

awry: If something goes awry, it does not happen in the way that was planned.

axiom

axiom: An axiom is a wise saying or widely recognized general truth that is often self-evident; it can also be an established rule or law.

badinage

badinage: Badinage is lighthearted conversation that involves teasing, jokes, and humor.

bagatelle

bagatelle: A bagatelle is something that is not important or of very little value or significance.

bailiwick

bailiwick: A bailiwick is a person's sphere of knowledge or learned skill.

baleful

baleful: Someone is baleful if they are filled with bad intent, anger, or hatred towards another person.

banal

banal: When you claim that something is banal, you do not like it because you think it is ordinary, dull, commonplace, and boring.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 21, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

bandy

bandy: When you bandy about ideas with someone, you casually discuss them without caring if the discussion is informed or effective in any way.

banter

banter: Banter is friendly conversation during which people make friendly jokes and laugh at—and with—one another.

bastion

bastion: A bastion is considered an important and effective defense of a way of life or principle; a bastion can also refer to a heavily fortified place, such as a castle.

bathos

bathos: In writing, bathos is the sudden change from a subject that is serious and important to one that is ordinary, silly, and unimportant.

beatific

beatific: A beatific expression, look, or smile shows great peace and happiness—it is angelic and saintly.

bedeck

bedeck: When you bedeck something, you decorate it in a showy way.

bedevil

bedevil: When something bedevils you, it causes you a lot of problems and difficulties over a period of time.

bedlam

bedlam: Bedlam is a situation with a great deal of noise and confusion.

beget

beget: When you beget something, you cause it to happen or create it.

beguile

beguile: If someone beguiles you, you are charmed by and attracted to them; you can also be tricked or deceived by someone who beguiles you.

behemoth

behemoth: A behemoth is monstrously large in size or power, such as a gigantic whale or corporation; sometimes this word is given a negative implication in the sense that a behemoth is so large that it is difficult or impossible to manage.

behest

behest: If something is done at someone's behest, it is done because they urgently ask for it or authoritatively order it to happen.

beholden

beholden: If you are beholden to someone, you are in their debt; therefore, you have a duty towards them because they have helped you in some way.

belabor

belabor: If you belabor a point, you keep emphasizing an idea or fact repeatedly in a way that is annoying.

beleaguer

beleaguer: When you beleaguer someone, you act with the intent to annoy or harass that person repeatedly until they finally give you what you want.

belie

belie: When one thing belies a second, it hides the true situation, producing a false idea or impression about that second thing.

bellicose

bellicose: If you are bellicose, you behave in an aggressive way and are likely to start an argument or fight.

belligerent

belligerent: A belligerent person or country is hostile, aggressive, very unfriendly, and prone to fight.

bemused

bemused: If you are bemused, you are puzzled and confused; hence, you are lost or absorbed in puzzling thought.

benefaction

benefaction: A benefaction is a charitable contribution of money or assistance that someone gives to a person or organization.

benign

benign: If you describe someone as benign, they are kind, gentle, and harmless.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 21, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

berate

berate: When you berate someone, you speak to them angrily because they have done something wrong.

bereaved

bereaved: A bereaved person is someone whose close friend or relative has recently died.

beset

beset: If you are beset by something, you are experiencing serious problems or dangers because of it.

besmirch

besmirch: If you besmirch someone, you spoil their good reputation by saying bad things about them, usually things that you know are not true.

bevy

bevy: A bevy is group or collection most often of people, but it can also refer to a group of animals.

bifurcate

bifurcate: When something is bifurcated, such as a path, it is divided into two separate parts that fork off from each other.

bigotry

bigotry: Bigotry is the expression of strong and unreasonable opinions without accepting or tolerating opposing views.

bilious

bilious: Someone who has a bilious personality is highly irritable and bad-tempered.

blight

blight: Something is a blight if it spoils or damages things severely; blight is often used to describe something that ruins or kills crops.

blithe

blithe: The adjective blithe indicates that someone does something casually or in a carefree fashion without much concern for the end result; as a result, they are happy and lighthearted.

bohemian

bohemian: A bohemian is someone who lives outside mainstream society, often embracing an unconventional lifestyle of self-expression, creativity, and rebellion against conventional rules and ways of society.

boisterous

boisterous: Someone who is boisterous is noisy, excitable, and full of boundless energy; therefore, they show a lack of disciplined restraint at times.

bolster

bolster: When you bolster something or someone, you offer support in a moment of need.

bombastic

bombastic: When a person is speaking or writing in a bombastic fashion, they are very self-centered, extremely showy, and excessively proud.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 21, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

bonhomie

bonhomie: Bonhomie is a friendly feeling among a group of people.

bowdlerize

bowdlerize: To bowdlerize a book, play, or other literary work is to remove parts of it that are considered indecent or unsuitable for family reading.

brackish

brackish: Something brackish is distasteful and unpleasant usually because something else is mixed in with it; brackish water, for instance, is a mixture of fresh and salt water and cannot be drunk.

braggadocio

braggadocio: Braggadocio is an excessively proud way of talking about your achievements or possessions that can annoy others.

bravado

bravado: Bravado is behavior that is deliberately intended to show courage or confidence, sometimes actual but usually pretended, in order to impress other people.

bravura

bravura: A bravura performance, such as of a highly technical work for the violin, is done with consummate skill.

brazen

brazen: If you describe a person's behavior as brazen, you mean that they are not embarrassed by anything they do—they simply don't care what other people think about them.

brevity

brevity: Brevity is the quality of expressing something concisely, either in just a few words or in a very short time.

bristling

bristling: Someone who has a bristling personality is easily offended, annoyed, or angered.

broach

broach: When you broach a subject, especially one that may be embarrassing or unpleasant, you mention it in order to begin a discussion about it.

brusque

brusque: If you describe a person's behavior or speech as brusque, you mean that they say or do things abruptly or too quickly in a somewhat rude and impolite way.

bucolic

bucolic: The adjective bucolic is used to describe things that are related to or characteristic of rural or country life.

buoyant

buoyant: Someone in a buoyant mood is in good spirits.

burgeon

burgeon: If something burgeons, it grows or develops quickly.

burnish

burnish: To burnish something is to work hard to improve it, such as polishing a metal until it shines.

buttress

buttress: When you buttress an argument, idea, or even a building, you make it stronger by providing support.

You checked "I Know This" on May 25, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

byzantine

byzantine: If you describe a system or process as byzantine, it means that you are criticizing it because it is excessively complicated and difficult to understand.

cabal

cabal: A cabal is a group of people who secretly meet to plan things in order to gain power.

cachet

cachet: Cachet is a special, distinguishing quality or feature possessed by someone or something that inspires admiration and generates prestige.

cacophony

cacophony: A cacophony is a loud, unpleasant mixture of sounds.

cadence

cadence: A cadence is a repeated pattern of movement or sound, such as the way someone's voice rises and falls when reading something out loud.

cadre

cadre: A cadre is a group specifically trained to lead, formalize, and accomplish a particular task or to train others as part of a larger organization; it can also be used to describe an elite military force.

cajole

cajole: You cajole people by gradually persuading them to do something, usually by being very nice to them.

caliber

caliber: The caliber of a person is the level or quality of their ability, intelligence, and other talents.

calligraphy

calligraphy: Calligraphy is the art of beautiful handwriting using special pens or brushes.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 25, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

callous

callous: A callous person's attitude is cruel, uncaring, and shows no concern for others whatsoever.

callow

callow: Someone who is callow is young, immature, and inexperienced; consequently, they possess little knowledge of the world.

calumny

calumny: Calumny consists of untrue or unfair statements about someone expressly made to hurt their reputation.

camaraderie

camaraderie: Camaraderie is a feeling of friendship and trust among a group of people who have usually known each over a long period of time.

canard

canard: A canard is a piece of news or information that is false; it is deliberately spread either to harm someone or as a hoax.

candor

candor: Candor is the quality of being honest and open in speech or action.

canonical

canonical: Something that is canonical is accepted as being accurate and authoritative--it possesses all the qualities that a thing of its kind should have.

canonize

canonize: When the Catholic Church canonizes someone, they are officially declared a saint; by extension, canonizing a person is to treat them as nearly sacred, whereas canonizing a work of art is to place it in an accepted group of the very best of its kind.

cantankerous

cantankerous: Someone who is cantankerous is bad-tempered and always finds things to complain about.

capacious

capacious: Something that is capacious has a lot of space and can contain a lot of things.

capitulate

capitulate: When you capitulate, you accept or agree to do something after having resisted doing so for a long time.

capricious

capricious: Someone who is capricious changes their mind repeatedly or behaves in unexpected ways; a capricious series of events follows no predictable pattern.

captious

captious: A captious person has a fondness for catching others at fault; hence, they are overly critical and raise unwarranted objections too often.

carapace

carapace: A carapace is the protective shell on the back of some animals, such as the tortoise or crab; by extension, if you build a carapace around yourself, you adopt a behavior or attitude designed to protect yourself.

cardinal

cardinal: A cardinal rule or quality is considered to be the most important or basic in a set of rules or qualities.

caricature

caricature: A caricature of someone is an exaggerated drawing or description that is designed to make that person look silly; it can also be an exaggerated description of a situation or event.

carp

carp: To carp at someone is to complain about them to their face or to nag and criticize them in a whining voice.

castigate

castigate: When you castigate someone, you criticize or punish them severely.

cataclysm

cataclysm: A cataclysm is a violent, sudden event that causes great change and/or harm.

catatonic

catatonic: A catatonic person is in a state of suspended action; therefore, they are rigid, immobile, and unresponsive.

catharsis

catharsis: Catharsis is the act or process of shedding intense memories or strong emotions by expressing them through writing, acting, or viewing other art forms.

caustic

caustic: A caustic remark is unkind, critical, cruel, and mocking.

cauterize

cauterize: If a doctor cauterizes a wound, they burn it with a laser or chemical to close it, which helps prevent infection.

cavalier

cavalier: A cavalier person does not seem to care about rules, principles, or other people's feelings, no matter how dire or serious a situation may be.

cavil

cavil: To cavil is to make unnecessary complaints about things that are unimportant.

cavort

cavort: When you cavort, you jump and dance around in a playful, excited, or physically lively way.

cede

cede: Someone cedes land or power to someone else by giving it to them, often because of political or military pressure.

celerity

celerity: If something moves or grows with celerity, it does so rapidly.

censure

censure: Censure is written or verbal disapproval and harsh criticism of something that someone has done.

chaff

chaff: Chaff is the husks of grain separated from the edible plant; it can also be useless matter in general that is cast aside.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 19, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

charlatan

charlatan: You describe someone as a charlatan if they pretend to have special knowledge or skill that they don't actually possess.

chary

chary: If you are chary of doing something, you are cautious or timid about doing it because you are afraid that something bad will happen.

chastise

chastise: If you chastise someone, you speak to them angrily or punish them for doing something wrong.

cherubic

cherubic: Someone is considered cherubic when they appear angelic in the natural and slightly fat way of a small child or baby.

chicanery

chicanery: If you employ chicanery, you are devising and carrying out clever plans and trickery to cheat and deceive people.

chimerical

chimerical: A chimerical idea is unrealistic, imaginary, or unlikely to be fulfilled.

chivalrous

chivalrous: A chivalrous man behaves in a polite, kind, generous, and honorable way, especially towards women.

choleric

choleric: A choleric person becomes angry very easily.

chronic

chronic: A chronic illness or pain is serious and lasts for a long time; a chronic problem is always happening or returning and is very difficult to solve.

churlish

churlish: Someone who is churlish is impolite and unfriendly, especially towards another who has done nothing to deserve ill-treatment.

circuitous

circuitous: A circuitous route, journey, or piece of writing is long and complicated rather than simple and direct.

circumlocution

circumlocution: Circumlocution is a way of saying or writing something that uses too many words, especially in order to avoid stating the true meaning clearly.

circumscribe

circumscribe: If one's powers or rights are circumscribed, they are limited or restricted.

circumspect

circumspect: If you are circumspect, you are cautious and you think carefully about something before you say or do it.

circumvent

circumvent: If you circumvent something, such as a rule or restriction, you try to get around it in a clever and perhaps dishonest way.

clairvoyant

clairvoyant: A clairvoyant person believes that they can predict the future or communicate with the spirits of the dead.

clandestine

clandestine: Something that is clandestine is hidden or kept a secret, often because it is illegal.

clarion

clarion: A clarion call is a stirring, emotional, and strong appeal to people to take action on something.

clemency

clemency: If someone is granted clemency, they are punished less severely than they could have been—they have been shown mercy.

clique

clique: A clique is a group of people that spends a lot of time together and tends to be unfriendly towards people who are not part of the group.

cloister

cloister: To cloister someone is to remove and isolate them from the rest of the world.

coagulate

coagulate: If liquid coagulates, it becomes thick and solid.

coalesce

coalesce: If two or more things coalesce, they come together to form a single larger unit.

You checked "I Know This" on May 18, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

coalition

coalition: A coalition is a temporary union of different political or social groups that agrees to work together to achieve a shared aim.

coda

coda: A coda is the final part of a piece of writing, speech, or music that acts as a summary.

coddle

coddle: To coddle someone is to offer too much protection from harm or difficult experiences.

codicil

codicil: A codicil is a supplement, usually to a will, that is added after the main part has been written.

coerce

coerce: You coerce people when you force them to do something that they don't want to do.

cogent

cogent: A cogent reason or argument is strong and convincing.

cogitate

cogitate: Cogitating about something is thinking deeply about it for a long time.

cognitive

cognitive: Cognitive describes those things related to judgment, memory, and other mental processes of knowing.

collate

collate: When you collate pieces of information, you gather them all together and arrange them in some sensible order in order to examine and compare those data efficiently.

colloquy

colloquy: A colloquy is a formal conversation.

collude

collude: If you collude with people, you work secretly with them to do something dishonest.

comely

comely: A person who is comely is attractive; this adjective is usually used with females, but not always.

comestible

comestible: A comestible is something that can be eaten.

commiserate

commiserate: If you commiserate with someone, you show them pity or sympathy because something bad or unpleasant has happened to them.

commodious

commodious: A commodious room or house is large and roomy, which makes it convenient and highly suitable for living.

commune

commune: If you commune with something, you communicate without using words because you feel especially close or in tune with it.

commutation

commutation: Commutation is the act of changing a punishment to one that is less severe.

compendium

compendium: A compendium is a detailed collection of information on a particular or specific subject, usually in a book.

complacent

complacent: Complacent persons are too confident and relaxed because they think that they can deal with a situation easily; however, in many circumstances, this is not the case.

complaisant

complaisant: If someone is complaisant, they are willing to please others and do what they want without complaining.

complicity

complicity: Complicity is the involvement in or knowledge of a situation that is illegal or bad.

comport

comport: If you comport yourself in a particular way, you behave in that way.

compunction

compunction: If you feel compunction about doing something, you feel that you should not do it because it is bad or wrong.

concatenate

concatenate: If you concatenate two or more things, you join them together by linking them one after the other.

conciliation

conciliation: Conciliation is a process intended to end an argument between two groups of people.

conclave

conclave: A conclave is a meeting between a group of people who discuss something secretly.

concomitant

concomitant: Something is concomitant when it happens at the same time as something else and is connected with it in some fashion.

concordant

concordant: Two people concordant with each other are in agreement or harmony.

condescend

condescend: When people condescend, they behave in ways that show that they are supposedly more important or intelligent than other people.

condign

condign: A condign reward or punishment is deserved by and appropriate or fitting for the person who receives it.

condole

condole: If you condole with someone, you express sympathy or sorrow, usually on the death of someone dear.

condone

condone: If you condone someone's behavior, you go along with it and provide silent support for it—despite doubts about it.

conflagration

conflagration: A conflagration is a fire that burns over a large area and is highly destructive.

conflate

conflate: If you conflate two or more descriptions or ideas, you combine them in order to produce a single unit.

confluence

confluence: A confluence is a situation where two or more things meet or flow together at a single point or area; a confluence usually refers to two streams joining together.

confound

confound: If something confounds you, it makes you feel surprised and confused, often because it does not meet your predefined expectations.

confute

confute: To confute an argument is to prove it to be thoroughly false; to confute a person is to prove them to be wrong.

congeal

congeal: When a liquid congeals, it becomes very thick and sticky, almost like a solid.

congenial

congenial: A congenial person, place, or environment is pleasant, friendly, and enjoyable.

conjecture

conjecture: A conjecture is a theory or guess that is based on information that is not certain or complete.

conjugal

conjugal: The adjective conjugal refers to marriage or the relationship between two married people.

connive

connive: If one person connives with another, they secretly plan to achieve something of mutual benefit, usually a thing that is illegal or immoral.

connoisseur

connoisseur: A connoisseur is someone who is an appreciative, informed, and knowledgeable judge of the fine arts; they can also just have excellent or perceptive taste in the fine arts without being an expert.

connote

connote: If a word or behavior connotes something, it suggests an additional idea or emotion that is not part of its original literal meaning.

consanguinity

consanguinity: Consanguinity is the state of being related to someone else by blood or having a similar close relationship to them.

conscript

conscript: To conscript someone is to force them into military service.

consternation

consternation: Consternation is the feeling of anxiety or fear, sometimes paralyzing in its effect, and often caused by something unexpected that has happened.

consummate

consummate: If someone shows consummate skill at doing something, that person's skill is very great or almost perfect in every way.

contagion

contagion: A contagion is a disease—or the transmission of that disease—that is easily spread from one person to another through touch or the air.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 16, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

contentious

contentious: When someone is contentious, they are argumentative and likely to provoke a fight.

contiguous

contiguous: Contiguous things are in contact with or near each other; contiguous events happen one right after the other without a break.

contingent

contingent: If something is contingent upon something else, the first thing depends on the second in order to happen or exist.

contravene

contravene: To contravene a law, rule, or agreement is to do something that is not allowed or is forbidden by that law, rule, or agreement.

contrite

contrite: If you are contrite, you are very sorry or ashamed that you have done something bad.

contumacious

contumacious: Someone who is contumacious is purposely stubborn, contrary, or disobedient.

conundrum

conundrum: A conundrum is a problem or puzzle that is difficult or impossible to solve.

convalescent

convalescent: A convalescent person spends time resting to gain health and strength after a serious illness or operation.

convivial

convivial: A convivial atmosphere or occasion is friendly, pleasant, cheerful, and relaxed.

convoke

convoke: To convoke a meeting or assembly is to bring people together for a formal gathering or ceremony of some kind.

convoluted

convoluted: Something convoluted, such as a difficult concept or procedure, is complex and takes many twists and turns.

You checked "I Know This" on May 12, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

copious

copious: A copious amount of something is a very large amount of it.

cornucopia

cornucopia: A cornucopia is a large quantity and variety of something good and nourishing.

corporeal

corporeal: The word corporeal refers to the physical or material world rather than the spiritual; it also means characteristic of the body rather than the mind or feelings.

corpulent

corpulent: Someone who is corpulent is extremely fat.

corroborate

corroborate: To corroborate something that has been said or reported means to give information or evidence that further supports it.

coterie

coterie: A coterie is a small group of people who are close friends; therefore, when its members do things together, they do not want other people to join them.

countenance

countenance: If someone will countenance something, they will approve, tolerate, or support it.

covert

covert: Covert activities or situations are secret and hidden.

covet

covet: If you covet something that someone else has, you have a strong desire to have it for yourself.

craven

craven: Someone who is craven is very cowardly.

credence

credence: Credence is the mental act of believing or accepting that something is true.

credulous

credulous: A credulous person is very ready to believe what people tell them; therefore, they can be easily tricked or cheated.

crepuscular

crepuscular: If something is crepuscular, it is dim, indistinct, and not easily visible; this word usually refers to twilight.

crescendo

crescendo: If something, such as a sound, is undergoing a crescendo, it is getting louder and louder or increasing in intensity and is about to reach its peak strength.

cronyism

cronyism: Cronyism is the practice of appointing your friends to favorable positions, especially political ones.

crux

crux: The crux of a problem or argument is the most important or difficult part of it that affects everything else.

cull

cull: If you cull items or information, you gather them from a number of different places in a selective manner.

culpable

culpable: If you are culpable for an action, you are held responsible for something wrong or bad that has happened.

curative

curative: Something that has curative properties can be used for curing people's illnesses.

curio

curio: A curio is an object that is very old or unusual; thus, it is viewed as interesting.

cursory

cursory: A cursory examination or reading of something is very quick, incomplete, and does not pay close attention to detail.

curtail

curtail: If you curtail something, you reduce or limit it.

cynosure

cynosure: A cynosure is an object that serves as the center of attention.

dank

dank: A dank room or building is unpleasantly damp and chilly.

dapper

dapper: A man who is dapper has a very neat and clean appearance; he is both fashionable and stylish.

daunt

daunt: If something daunts you, it makes you worried about dealing with it because you think it will be very difficult or dangerous.

dearth

dearth: When there is a dearth of something, there is a scarcity or lack of it.

debacle

debacle: A debacle is something, such as an event or attempt, that fails completely in an embarrassing way.

debility

debility: Debility is a state of being physically or mentally weak, usually due to illness.

debonair

debonair: A man who is debonair wears fashionable clothes and is sophisticated, charming, friendly, and confident.

decadent

decadent: A decadent person has low moral standards and is more interested in pleasure than serious matters.

decimate

decimate: If you decimate something, you destroy a large part of it, reducing its size and effectiveness greatly.

decipher

decipher: When you decipher a message or piece of writing, you work out what it says, even though it is very difficult to read or understand.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 21, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

decorous

decorous: Decorous appearance or behavior is respectable, polite, and appropriate for a given occasion.

decrepitude

decrepitude: Decrepitude is the state of being very old, worn out, or very ill; therefore, something or someone is no longer in good physical condition or good health.

decry

decry: To decry something is to speak against it and find fault with it.

deference

deference: If you behave with deference towards someone, you show them respect and accept their opinions or decisions, especially because they have an important position.

defile

defile: To defile something holy or important is to do something to it or say something about it that is highly offensive to others.

defoliate

defoliate: Someone defoliates a tree or plant by removing its leaves, usually by applying a chemical agent.

deft

deft: A deft movement or action is made quickly and with skill.

deify

deify: If someone is deified, they have been either made into a god or are adored like one.

deign

deign: If someone deigns to do something, they agree to do it—but in a way that shows that they are lowering or humbling themselves to do so or that it is a very great favor.

delectable

delectable: If you describe something, especially food and drink, as delectable, you mean that it is very pleasant, tasty, or attractive.

deleterious

deleterious: Something that is deleterious has a harmful effect.

deliberate

deliberate: If you deliberate, you think about or discuss something very carefully, especially before making an important decision.

delineate

delineate: If you delineate something, such as an idea or situation or border, you describe it in great detail.

deluge

deluge: A deluge is a sudden, heavy downfall of rain; it can also be a large number of things, such as papers or e-mails, that someone gets all at the same time, making them very difficult to handle.

delusive

delusive: Something that is delusive deceives you by giving a false belief about yourself or the situation you are in.

demagogue

demagogue: A demagogue is someone, usually a political leader, who tries to influence people by making emotional speeches rather than using reasonable arguments.

demeanor

demeanor: Your demeanor is the way you look and behave, which gives people insight into your character and feelings.

demur

demur: If you demur, you delay in doing or mildly object to something because you don't really want to do it.

demure

demure: If you describe someone, usually a young woman, as demure, you mean that she is quiet, shy, and always behaves modestly.

denigrate

denigrate: If you denigrate something, you criticize or speak ill of it in a way that shows you think it has little to no value at all.

denizen

denizen: A denizen is a person who inhabits a particular place; a denizen can also be a person who visits a place often, such as a restaurant or library.

denouement

denouement: A denouement is the end of a book, play, or series of events when everything is explained and comes to a conclusion.

denounce

denounce: If you denounce people or actions, you criticize them severely in public because you feel strongly that they are wrong or evil.

denude

denude: To denude an area is to remove the plants and trees that cover it; it can also mean to make something bare.

deportment

deportment: Your deportment is the way you behave, walk, and stand in public.

depravity

depravity: Depravity is behavior that is immoral, corrupt, or evil.

deprecate

deprecate: If you deprecate something, you disapprove of it strongly.

derelict

derelict: Something, such as a building, is derelict if it is empty, not used, and in bad condition or disrepair.

derision

derision: If you treat someone with derision, you mock or make fun of them because you think they are stupid, unimportant, or useless.

desecrate

desecrate: If you desecrate something that is considered holy or very special, you deliberately spoil or damage it.

desiccate

desiccate: Something that is desiccated has had all the water taken out of it; this is a common process used for food in order to preserve it.

desiderata

desiderata: Desiderata are a wish list of things that are considered highly desirable or necessary to have.

despicable

despicable: If you say a person's actions are despicable, you think they are extremely unpleasant or nasty.

despondent

despondent: If you are despondent, you are extremely unhappy because you are in an unpleasant situation which you do not think will improve.

despot

despot: A despot is a leader who has a lot of power and uses it in a cruel and unreasonable way.

desultory

desultory: Something that is desultory is done in a way that is unplanned, disorganized, and without direction.

detritus

detritus: Detritus is the small pieces of waste that remain after something has been destroyed or used.

devolve

devolve: When something devolves, such as a responsibility or a person's status, it passes along to another person.

diabolical

diabolical: If you say something is diabolical, you are emphasizing that it is evil, cruel, or very bad.

diadem

diadem: A diadem is a metal circle or crown that has jewels encrusted in it.

dialectic

dialectic: Dialectic is a dialogue between two people who present logical arguments in order to persuade each other of the truth of their opinion; during this interchange, the debaters arrive at a truth, which often involves parts of each debater's opinion.

diaphanous

diaphanous: A diaphanous cloth is thin enough to see through.

diaspora

diaspora: A diaspora is a voluntary or forced movement of an ethnic people who permanently relocate in areas remote from their homeland.

diatribe

diatribe: A diatribe is a speech or piece of writing that angrily attacks someone's ideas or activities at length.

dichotomy

dichotomy: If there is a dichotomy between two things, there is a division of great difference or opposition between them.

dictum

dictum: A dictum is a saying that people often repeat because it says something interesting or wise about a subject.

didactic

didactic: Didactic speech or writing is intended to teach something, especially a moral lesson.

diffident

diffident: Someone who is diffident is shy, does not want to draw notice to themselves, and is lacking in self-confidence.

diffuse

diffuse: When something is diffuse, it is widely spread out and scattered.

You checked "I Know This" on May 14, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

dilapidated

dilapidated: A dilapidated building, vehicle, etc. is old, broken-down, and in very bad condition.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 25, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

dilatory

dilatory: Someone or something that is dilatory is slow and causes delay.

dilettante

dilettante: A dilettante is someone who frequently pursues an interest in a subject; nevertheless, they never spend the time and effort to study it thoroughly enough to master it.

diminution

diminution: A diminution of something is a reduction in the size, number, or importance of it.

diorama

diorama: A diorama is a scene, reproduced in three dimensions, that places objects and figures in front of a painted background.

dirge

dirge: A dirge is a slow and sad piece of music often performed at funerals.

disabuse

disabuse: If you disabuse someone of an idea or notion, you persuade them that the idea is in fact untrue.

disaffected

disaffected: A disaffected member of a group or organization is not satisfied with it; consequently, they feel little loyalty towards it.

disburse

disburse: To disburse is to pay out money, usually from a large fund that has been collected for a specific purpose.

discern

discern: If you discern something, especially something that is not obvious, you notice, detect, or perceive it, especially after thinking about it carefully or studying it.

discomfit

discomfit: If something discomfits you, it makes you feel embarrassed, confused, uncomfortable, or frustrated.

disconcert

disconcert: If something disconcerts you, it makes you feel anxious, worried, or confused.

discordant

discordant: A situation or thing that is discordant does not fit in with other things; therefore, it is disagreeable, strange, or unpleasant.

discursive

discursive: A piece of writing is discursive if it includes a lot of information that is not relevant to the main subject.

disingenuous

disingenuous: Someone who is disingenuous is not straightforward or is dishonest in what they say or do.

disinter

disinter: When a dead body is disinterred, it is dug up; likewise, something disinterred is exposed or revealed to the public after having been hidden for some time.

disinterested

disinterested: Someone does something in a disinterested way when they have no personal involvement or attachment to the action.

disparage

disparage: If you disparage someone or something, you say unpleasant words that show you have no respect for that person or thing.

disparate

disparate: Things that are disparate are clearly different from each other and belong to different groups or classes.

disquiet

disquiet: When someone feels disquiet about a situation, they feel very worried or nervous.

dissemble

dissemble: When people dissemble, they hide their real thoughts, feelings, or intentions.

disseminate

disseminate: To disseminate something, such as knowledge or information, is to distribute it so that it reaches a lot of people.

dissension

dissension: Dissension is a disagreement or conflict of opinion among a group of people.

dissident

dissident: A dissident is someone who disagrees publicly with a government, especially in a country where this is not allowed.

dissolution

dissolution: Dissolution is the breaking up or official end of a group, such as a couple or institution; it can also be the act of separating something into smaller components.

You checked "I Know This" on May 21, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

dissonance

dissonance: Dissonance is an unpleasant situation of opposition in which ideas or actions are not in agreement or harmony; dissonance also refers to a harsh combination of sounds.

distend

distend: If a part of your body distends, it becomes swollen and unnaturally large.

diurnal

diurnal: Something that is diurnal happens on a daily basis.

divest

divest: If you divest someone of power, rights, or authority, you take those things away from them.

divisive

divisive: Something that is divisive is likely to cause arguments between people.

divulge

divulge: To divulge something is to reveal information that was once private or secret.

docile

docile: An animal or person that is docile is not aggressive; rather, they are well-behaved, quiet, and easy to control.

dogmatic

dogmatic: Someone is being dogmatic when they express opinions in an assertive and often overly self-important manner.

dolorous

dolorous: Something that is dolorous, such as music or news, causes mental pain and sorrow because it itself is full of grief and sorrow.

domicile

domicile: Your domicile is the place where you live or your home.

dour

dour: Someone who is dour is serious, stubborn, and unfriendly.

draconian

draconian: Draconian rules and laws are extremely strict and harsh.

droll

droll: When something is droll, it is humorous in an odd way.

dross

dross: Something described as dross is of very poor quality and has little or no value.

dulcet

dulcet: A dulcet sound is soft and pleasant in a gentle way.

duplicity

duplicity: If you accuse someone of duplicity, you think that they are dishonest and are intending to trick you.

duress

duress: Duress is the application or threat of force to compel someone to act in a particular way.

ebullient

ebullient: Someone who is ebullient is filled with enthusiasm, very happy, and extremely excited about something.

eccentric

eccentric: If someone is eccentric, they behave in a strange and unusual way that is different from most people.

ecclesiastical

ecclesiastical: The adjective ecclesiastical refers to a priest or member of the clergy in the Christian Church; this word also refers to something associated with a church as an organized institution.

echelon

echelon: An echelon is one level of status or rank in an organization.

eclectic

eclectic: An eclectic assortment of things or people comes from many varied sources; additionally, it usually includes the best of those sources.

ecumenical

ecumenical: Ecumenical activities and ideas encourage different religions or congregations to work and worship together in order to unite them in friendship.

edict

edict: An edict is an official order or command given by a government or someone in authority.

edification

edification: If something is done for someone's edification, it is done to benefit that person by teaching them something that improves or enlightens their knowledge or character.

edifice

edifice: An edifice is a large or impressive building, such as a church, palace, temple, or fortress.

efface

efface: To efface something is to erase or remove it completely from recognition or memory.

effervescent

effervescent: An effervescent individual is lively, very happy, and enthusiastic.

effete

effete: If you describe a person, group, or civilization as effete, you mean it is weak, exhausted, powerless, unproductive, and/or corrupt.

efficacy

efficacy: Efficacy is the ability or power to produce an expected effect or result.

effrontery

effrontery: Effrontery is very rude behavior that shows a great lack of respect and is often insulting.

effulgent

effulgent: Something that is effulgent is very bright and radiates light.

effusive

effusive: Someone who is effusive expresses happiness, pleasure, admiration, praise, etc., in an extremely enthusiastic way.

egregious

egregious: An egregious mistake, failure, or problem is an extremely bad and very noticeable one.

egress

egress: Egress is the act of going out or exiting from an enclosed space; it can also be the exit itself.

You checked "I Know This" on Aug 8, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

elegy

elegy: An elegy is a poem or other piece of writing expressing sadness; it is often about someone who has died.

elocution

elocution: Someone's elocution is their artistic manner of speaking in public, including both the delivery of their voice and gestures.

elucidate

elucidate: If you elucidate something, you make it easier to understand by giving more relevant information.

elude

elude: If a fact or idea eludes you, you cannot remember or understand it; if you elude someone, you manage to escape or hide from them.

emaciated

emaciated: A person or animal that is emaciated is extremely thin because of a serious illness or lack of food.

embellish

embellish: If you embellish something, you make it more beautiful by decorating it.

emissary

emissary: An emissary is someone who acts as a representative from one government or leader to another.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 29, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

emollient

emollient: An emollient substance soothes your skin and provides moisture.

emolument

emolument: Emolument is money or another form of payment you get for work you have done.

empathy

empathy: Empathy is the ability to understand how people feel because you can imagine what it is to be like them.

empirical

empirical: Empirical evidence or study is based on real experience or scientific experiments rather than on unproven theories.

emulate

emulate: If you emulate someone, you try to behave the same way they do because you admire them a great deal.

enclave

enclave: An enclave is a small area within a larger area of a city or country in which people of a different nationality or culture live.

encomium

encomium: An encomium strongly praises someone or something via oral or written communication.

encumber

encumber: If something encumbers you, it makes it difficult for you to move freely or do what you want.

endemic

endemic: Something that is endemic to a place, such as a disease or life form, is very frequently found in and restricted to that area or region.

enervate

enervate: If you feel enervated, you feel very tired and weak—almost to the point of collapse.

engender

engender: If something engenders a particular feeling or attitude, it causes that condition.

enigmatic

enigmatic: Someone or something that is enigmatic is mysterious and difficult to understand.

enjoin

enjoin: When you enjoin someone to do something, you order or bid him to do it with authority.

ennui

ennui: Ennui is the feeling of being bored, tired, and dissatisfied with life.

enormity

enormity: If you refer to the enormity of a situation, problem, or event, you mean that it is very evil or morally offensive; this word has nothing to do with physical size.

ensconce

ensconce: If you ensconce yourself somewhere, you put yourself into a comfortable place or safe position and have no intention of moving or leaving for quite some time.

ensue

ensue: When something ensues, it happens after or as a result of another event.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 22, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

enthrall

enthrall: If something enthralls you, it makes you so interested and excited that you give it all your attention.

entourage

entourage: An entourage is a group of assistants, servants, and other people who tag along with an important person.

entropy

entropy: Entropy is the lack of organization or measure of disorder currently in a system.

envisage

envisage: When you envisage something, you imagine or consider its future possibility.

ephemeral

ephemeral: Something ephemeral, such as some insects or a sunset, lasts for only a short time or has a very short lifespan.

epicurean

epicurean: Someone who is epicurean derives great pleasure in material and sensual things, especially good food and drink.

epigram

epigram: An epigram is a short poem or sentence that expresses something, such as a feeling or idea, in a short, clever, and amusing way.

epiphany

epiphany: An epiphany is the moment when someone suddenly realizes or understands something of great significance or importance.

epitome

epitome: If you say that a person or thing is the epitome of something, you mean that they or it is the best possible example of that thing.

epochal

epochal: Something that is epochal is highly significant or important; this adjective often refers to the bringing about or marking of the beginning of a new era.

equanimity

equanimity: If you exhibit equanimity, you demonstrate a calm mental state—without showing upset or annoyance—when you deal with a difficult situation.

equivocate

equivocate: When people equivocate, they avoid making a clear statement; they are deliberately vague in order to avoid giving a direct answer to a question.

errant

errant: Anything or anyone errant behaves in a way that is unacceptable or wrong; for example, an errant missile travels in the wrong direction, while an errant student does not follow classroom rules.

ersatz

ersatz: If you describe something as ersatz, you dislike it because it is artificial or fake—and is used in place of a higher quality item.

erstwhile

erstwhile: An erstwhile friend is a friend no longer.

erudite

erudite: Someone who is erudite is steeped in knowledge because they have read and studied extensively.

escarpment

escarpment: An escarpment is a wide, steep slope or ridge, formed by erosion, that rises suddenly from level land.

eschew

eschew: If you eschew something, you deliberately avoid doing it, especially for moral reasons.

esoteric

esoteric: Something esoteric is known about or understood by very few people.

espouse

espouse: If you espouse an idea, principle, or belief, you support it wholeheartedly.

ethereal

ethereal: Something ethereal has a delicate beauty that makes it seem not part of the real world.

eulogy

eulogy: A eulogy is a speech or other piece of writing, often part of a funeral, in which someone or something is highly praised.

euphemism

euphemism: A euphemism is a polite synonym or expression that people use when they want to avoid talking about—or indirectly replace—an unpleasant or embarrassing thing.

euphony

euphony: Euphony is a pleasing sound in speech or music.

evanescent

evanescent: Something that is evanescent lasts for only a short time before disappearing from sight or memory.

evince

evince: If you evince particular feelings, qualities, or attitudes, you show them, often clearly.

evocation

evocation: An evocation of something creates or summons a clear mental image or impression of it through words, pictures, or music.

exacerbate

exacerbate: If something exacerbates a problem or bad situation, it makes it even worse.

exacting

exacting: Someone who is exacting expects others to work very hard and carefully.

excise

excise: When you excise something, you remove it by cutting it out.

excoriate

excoriate: If you excoriate someone, you express very strong disapproval of something they did.

exculpate

exculpate: If you exculpate someone, you prove that they are not guilty of a crime.

exegesis

exegesis: Exegesis is a detailed explanation or interpretation of a piece of writing, especially a religious one.

exhort

exhort: If you exhort someone to do something, you try very hard to persuade them to do it.

exigent

exigent: An exigent situation is urgent and demands a lot of attention, often in ways that are expensive in time, cost, and effort.

exonerate

exonerate: When someone is exonerated from guilt, a task, or a responsibility, they are set free or excused from it.

exorbitant

exorbitant: An exorbitant price or fee is much higher than what it should be or what is considered reasonable.

expedite

expedite: When you expedite an action or process, you make it happen more quickly.

expiate

expiate: If you expiate your crimes, guilty feelings, or bad behavior in general, you show you are sorry by doing something good to make up for the bad things you did.

explicate

explicate: To explicate an idea or plan is to make it clear by explaining it.

exponent

exponent: An exponent of a particular idea or cause is someone who supports or defends it.

expostulate

expostulate: If you expostulate with someone, you express strong disagreement with or disapproval of what that person is doing.

expropriate

expropriate: If you expropriate something, you take it away for your own use although it does not belong to you; governments frequently expropriate private land to use for public purposes.

expunge

expunge: If you expunge something, you completely remove it or do away with it.

expurgate

expurgate: To expurgate part of a book, play, or other text is to remove parts of it before publishing because they are considered objectionable, harmful, or offensive.

extant

extant: If something is extant, it is still in existence despite being very old.

extemporaneous

extemporaneous: Something that is extemporaneous, such as an action, speech, or performance, is done without any preparation or practice beforehand.

extenuate

extenuate: If there are extenuating circumstances in a questionable situation, you feel that it was reasonable for someone to break the usual rules; therefore, you partly excuse and sympathize with their wrongdoing.

extirpate

extirpate: If you extirpate something, you completely destroy it because it is unpleasant or unwanted.

extol

extol: If you extol something or someone, you praise it or them very enthusiastically.

extricate

extricate: When you extricate yourself from a difficult or unpleasant situation, you manage to escape it.

exuberance

exuberance: If you show exuberance, you display great excitement, energy, and enthusiasm.

exude

exude: If you exude a quality or feeling, people easily notice that you have a large quantity of it because it flows from you; if a smell or liquid exudes from something, it flows steadily and slowly from it.

exult

exult: If you exult, you show great pleasure and excitement, especially about something you have achieved.

facade

facade: A facade is a false outward appearance or way of behaving that hides what someone or something is really like.

facetious

facetious: Someone who is being facetious says things they intend to be funny but are nevertheless out of place.

facile

facile: If you criticize someone's arguments as being facile, you consider their ideas simplistic and not well thought through.

factious

factious: A small group or issue that is factious is controversial and promotes strong disagreement or dissatisfaction within a larger group.

factitious

factitious: Something factitious is not genuine or natural; it is made to happen in a forced, artificial way.

fallacy

fallacy: A fallacy is an idea or belief that is false.

fallow

fallow: A fallow period is a time when not much happens or is being achieved.

farce

farce: A situation or event is a farce if it is very badly organized and consequently unsuccessful—or so silly and ridiculous that you cannot take it seriously.

fastidious

fastidious: Someone who is fastidious cares a lot about small details and wants to keep everything correct, tidy, and in perfect order.

fathom

fathom: If you fathom something complicated or mysterious, you are able to understand it.

fatuous

fatuous: If you think something, such as a statement or idea, is fatuous, you consider it stupid or extremely silly; a fatuous hope is unrealistic.

fawn

fawn: To fawn over someone is to be extremely nice to her in an insincere way because you want her to like you or give you something.

fealty

fealty: If you show fealty to a queen, you show your loyalty to her.

febrile

febrile: Febrile behavior is full of nervous energy and activity; a sick person can be febrile as well, that is, feverish or hot.

fecundity

fecundity: If someone, such as a writer, is described as having fecundity, they have the ability to produce many original and different ideas.

feign

feign: If you feign something, such as a sickness or an attitude, you pretend and try to convince people that you have it—even though you don't.

feint

feint: A feint is the act of pretending to make a movement in one direction while actually moving in the other, especially to trick an opponent; a feint can also be a deceptive act meant to turn attention away from one's true purpose.

felicity

felicity: If you are experiencing felicity about something, you are very happy about it.

fervid

fervid: A fervid person has strong feelings about something, such as a humanitarian cause; therefore, they are very sincere and enthusiastic about it.

fester

fester: If a wound festers, it becomes infected, making it worse; if a problem or unpleasant feeling festers, it becomes worse because no attention has been paid to it.

fete

fete: A fete is a celebration or festival in honor of a special occasion.

fetid

fetid: Fetid water or air has a bad odor, usually caused by decay.

fetter

fetter: If something fetters you, it restricts you from doing something you want to do.

fiasco

fiasco: If an event becomes a fiasco, it is a complete and embarrassing failure.

fiat

fiat: A fiat is an official order from a person or group in authority.

figurative

figurative: If you use words in a figurative way, they have an abstract or symbolic meaning beyond their literal interpretation.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 27, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

filial

filial: The adjective filial is used to describe relationships or feelings that exist between daughters and sons and their parents.

finesse

finesse: If someone exhibits finesse in something, they do it with great skill and care; this most often refers to handling difficult situations that might easily offend people.

flaccid

flaccid: Something is flaccid when it is unpleasantly soft and weak, hangs limply, or lacks vigor and energy.

flagrant

flagrant: An action that is flagrant shows that someone does not care if they obviously break the rules or highly offend people.

flamboyant

flamboyant: If someone is flamboyant, they are trying to show off in a way that deliberately attracts attention.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 26, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

flippant

flippant: When a person is being flippant, they are not taking something as seriously as they should be; therefore, they tend to dismiss things they should respectfully pay attention to.

florid

florid: Something florid has too much decoration or is too elaborate.

flout

flout: If you flout a rule or custom, you deliberately refuse to conform to it.

foible

foible: A foible is a small weakness or character flaw in a person that is considered somewhat unusual; that said, it is also viewed as unimportant and harmless.

foist

foist: If you foist a job or task upon someone, you force them to deal with or experience it despite the fact that it is undesirable.

foment

foment: To foment is to encourage people to protest, fight, or cause trouble and violent opposition to something that is viewed by some as undesirable.

forage

forage: If you forage for things, such as keys or coins, you search for them inside a backpack or purse; when animals forage, they search for food over a wide area.

formidable

formidable: If something is formidable, it is impressive in size, power, or skill; therefore, it can make you feel frightened, alarmed, or in awe because it is so powerful or difficult to deal with.

forte

forte: If something is your forte, you are very good at it or know a lot about it.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 20, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

fortuitous

fortuitous: Something fortuitous happens purely by chance and produces a successful or pleasant result.

fracas

fracas: A fracas is a rough and noisy fight or loud argument that can involve multiple people.

fractious

fractious: If someone is fractious, they are easily upset or annoyed over unimportant things.

frenetic

frenetic: Frenetic activity is done quickly with lots of energy but is also uncontrolled and disorganized; someone who is in a huge hurry often displays this type of behavior.

frugal

frugal: Someone who is frugal spends very little money—and even then only on things that are absolutely necessary.

fruition

fruition: If something, such as an idea or plan, comes to fruition, it produces the result you wanted to achieve from it.

fugue

fugue: A fugue is a piece of classical music that starts with a simple thematic melody; subsequently, it is developed into a complicated pattern by repeating that melody with different instruments, voices, or keys.

fulsome

fulsome: Praise, an apology, or gratitude is fulsome if it is so exaggerated and elaborate that it does not seem sincere.

functionary

functionary: A functionary is a minor official who works for a government or political party; they attend to administrative tasks that are small and trivial.

fungible

fungible: Two items are fungible if one can be exchanged for the other with no loss in inherent value; for example, one $10 bill and two $5 bills are fungible.

furtive

furtive: If someone behaves in a furtive way, they do things sneakily and secretly in order to avoid being noticed.

gainsay

gainsay: If you gainsay something, you say that it is not true and therefore reject it.

galvanize

galvanize: When you galvanize someone, you cause them to improve a situation, solve a problem, or take some other action by making them feel excited, afraid, or angry.

gambit

gambit: A gambit is something that you say or do in order to gain an advantage in a given situation or game.

gamut

gamut: A gamut is a complete range of things of a particular type or the full extent of possibilities of some experience or action.

garbled

garbled: A garbled message or speech is confusing and not understandable, often because it is spoken in a hurry or is communicated with lots of accompanying noise.

gargantuan

gargantuan: Something gargantuan is extremely large.

garish

garish: Something garish is very bright and colorful but in an ugly, cheap, and showy way.

garrulous

garrulous: A garrulous person talks a lot, especially about unimportant things.

You checked "I Know This" on Aug 3, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

gauche

gauche: A gauche person behaves in an awkward and unsuitable way in public because they lack social skills.

gaunt

gaunt: If someone looks gaunt, they are very thin, usually because they are ill, tired, or worried.

generic

generic: A generic description or attribute is not specific to any one thing but applies to all members of an entire class or group.

genuflect

genuflect: When you genuflect, you show a lot more respect to something or someone than is usual or sometimes necessary.

germane

germane: An idea or remark is germane to a situation if it is connected to it in an important or fitting way.

gestation

gestation: Gestation is the process by which a new idea, plan, or piece of work develops in your mind.

gesticulate

gesticulate: When someone gesticulates, they make movements with their hands and arms when talking, usually because they want to emphasize something or are having difficulty in expressing an idea using words alone.

gilded

gilded: If something is gilded, it has been deceptively given a more attractive appearance than it normally possesses; a very thin layer of gold often covers something gilded.

glib

glib: If someone is being glib, they make something sound simple, easy, and problem-free— when it isn't at all.

gloss

gloss: If you gloss a difficult word, phrase, or other text, you provide an explanation for it in the form of a note.

glutinous

glutinous: Something that is glutinous is thick and very sticky, often in an unpleasant way.

gossamer

gossamer: A gossamer material is very thin, light, and delicate.

gradation

gradation: A gradation is a series of successive small differences or changes in something that add up to an overall major change; this word can also refer to a degree or step in that series of changes.

grandiloquent

grandiloquent: Grandiloquent speech is highly formal, exaggerated, and often seems both silly and hollow because it is expressly used to appear impressive and important.

gratuitous

gratuitous: If something is gratuitous, it is freely given; nevertheless, it is usually unnecessary and can be harmful or upsetting.

gravity

gravity: The gravity of a situation or event is its seriousness or importance.

gregarious

gregarious: A gregarious person is friendly, highly social, and prefers being with people rather than being alone.

gullible

gullible: A gullible person is easy to trick because they are too trusting of other people.

gumption

gumption: If someone has gumption he is brave and sensible enough to do the right thing in a particularly difficult situation.

guttural

guttural: A guttural sound is deep, harsh, and made at the back of someone's throat.

hackneyed

hackneyed: Hackneyed words, images, ideas or sayings have been used so often that they no longer seem interesting or amusing.

halcyon

halcyon: A halcyon time is calm, peaceful, and undisturbed.

hallowed

hallowed: Something that is hallowed is respected and admired, usually because it is holy or important in some way.

hapless

hapless: A hapless person is unlucky, so much so that a stream of unfortunate things has happened and continues to happen to them.

harangue

harangue: A harangue is a long, scolding speech.

harbinger

harbinger: A harbinger is a sign that foretells that something is going to happen, especially something bad.

hauteur

hauteur: Hauteur is the spirit of someone who is proud, unfriendly, and arrogant.

hedonism

hedonism: Hedonism is the belief that pleasure is important, so much so that life should be spent doing only things that one enjoys.

heinous

heinous: If you describe something as heinous, you mean that is extremely evil, shocking, and bad.

heretic

heretic: A heretic is someone who doubts or acts in opposition to commonly or generally accepted beliefs.

hermetic

hermetic: The adjective hermetic describes something that is set apart, isolated, or separate from the influence or interference of society at large.

heterodox

heterodox: Heterodox beliefs, ideas, or practices are different from accepted or official ones.

heuristic

heuristic: A heuristic method of teaching encourages learning based on students' discovering and experiencing things for themselves.

hiatus

hiatus: A hiatus is a period of time when there is a break or interruption in some activity.

hierarchy

hierarchy: A hierarchy is a system of organization in a society, company, or other group in which people are divided into different ranks or levels of importance.

You checked "I Know This" on May 8, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

histrionic

histrionic: If you describe someone's behavior as histrionic, you disapprove of it because it is overly loud, dramatic, emotional, and insincere.

homily

homily: A homily is a speech or piece of writing that advises people about how they ought to behave from a moral perspective.

homogeneous

homogeneous: The word homogeneous is used to describe a group that has members or parts which are similar or are all of the same type.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 17, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

homologous

homologous: Things that are homologous are similar in structure, function, or value; these qualities may suggest or indicate a common ancestor or origin.

You checked "I Know This" on Aug 11, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

hubris

hubris: If you think someone is showing hubris, you think that they are demonstrating excessive pride and vanity.

hyperbole

hyperbole: Hyperbole is a way of emphasizing something that makes it sound much more impressive or much worse than it actually is.

hypochondriac

hypochondriac: A hypochondriac is a person who worries excessively about his or her health and thinks that an illness is present or about to occur when there is really nothing wrong.

hypothetical

hypothetical: Something that is hypothetical is based on possible situations or events rather than actual ones.

iconoclast

iconoclast: An iconoclast is someone who often attacks beliefs, ideas, or customs that are generally accepted by society.

idiosyncratic

idiosyncratic: Idiosyncratic tendencies, behavior, or habits are unusual and strange.

idolatry

idolatry: If you believe someone's behavior exhibits idolatry, you think they blindly admire someone or something too much.

idyll

idyll: An idyll is a place or situation that is extremely pleasant, peaceful, and has no problems.

ignominy

ignominy: Ignominy is a dishonorable or shameful situation in which someone feels publicly embarrassed and loses the respect of others.

illusory

illusory: Something illusory appears real or possible; in fact, it is neither.

imbibe

imbibe: If you imbibe ideas, values, or qualities, you absorb them into your mind.

imbroglio

imbroglio: An imbroglio is a very difficult, confusing, and complicated situation.

imbue

imbue: To imbue someone with a quality, such as an emotion or idea, is to fill that person completely with it.

immanent

immanent: An immanent quality is present within something and is so much a part of it that the object cannot be imagined without that quality.

imminent

imminent: An imminent event, especially an event that is unpleasant, is almost certain to happen within the very near future.

immutable

immutable: Something that is immutable is always the same and cannot be changed.

impasse

impasse: An impasse is a difficult situation in which progress is not possible, usually because none of the people involved are willing to agree.

impassive

impassive: If someone is impassive, they are not showing any emotion.

impeccable

impeccable: If you describe someone's appearance or behavior as impeccable, you mean that it is perfect and therefore impossible to criticize.

You checked "I Know This" on May 19, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

impecunious

impecunious: Someone who is impecunious has very little money, especially over a long period of time.

imperious

imperious: Someone who is imperious behaves in a proud, overbearing, and highly confident manner that shows they expect to be obeyed without question.

impertinent

impertinent: If someone behaves in an impertinent way, they behave rudely and disrespectfully.

imperturbable

imperturbable: If someone is imperturbable, they are always calm and not easily upset or disturbed by any situation, even dangerous ones.

impervious

impervious: If you are impervious to things, such as someone's actions or words, you are not affected by them or do not notice them.

impetuous

impetuous: Someone who is impetuous does things quickly and rashly without thinking carefully first.

impetus

impetus: An impetus is a force or influence that makes something happen or develop more quickly.

impinge

impinge: If something impinges on you, it affects you in some negative way.

implacable

implacable: If someone is implacable, they very stubbornly react to situations or the opinions of others because of strong feelings that make them unwilling to change their mind.

importunate

importunate: If you describe someone as importunate, you think that he is annoying and unreasonable because he keeps trying to get something from you.

imprecation

imprecation: An imprecation is a rude, offensive phrase or word that is said to someone or about someone especially when one is angry.

impregnable

impregnable: An impregnable opinion or feeling is very difficult to change.

imprimatur

imprimatur: If something, such as a product or book, has an official's imprimatur, that authority has given it their official approval.

impudence

impudence: If someone demonstrates impudence, they behave in a very rude or disrespectful way.

impugn

impugn: If you impugn someone's motives or integrity, you say that they do not deserve to be trusted.

impunity

impunity: If you say that someone does something with impunity, you dislike the fact that they are not being punished for doing something illegal.

impute

impute: If you impute something, such as blame or a crime, to somebody, you say (usually unfairly) that that person is responsible for it.

inane

inane: If you describe someone's behavior as inane, you think it is completely stupid or without much meaning.

incarcerate

incarcerate: If you incarcerate someone, you put them in prison.

inchoate

inchoate: If an idea, plan, or attitude is inchoate, it is vague and imperfectly formed because it is just starting to develop.

incipient

incipient: An incipient situation or quality is just beginning to appear or develop.

incisive

incisive: If an idea or thought is incisive, it is expressed in a penetrating and knowledgeable manner that is clear and brief; additionally, it can demonstrate impressive understanding of related ideas or thoughts.

incognito

incognito: Someone who is going around incognito is using a false name and/or has changed their appearance in order not to be recognized.

incommensurate

incommensurate: One thing that is incommensurate with another is different in its level, size, or quality from the second; this may lead to an unfair situation.

incongruous

incongruous: Something that is incongruous is strange when considered along with its group because it seems very different from the other things in its group.

inconspicuous

inconspicuous: Something that is inconspicuous does not attract attention and is not easily seen or noticed because it is small or ordinary.

incontrovertible

incontrovertible: Incontrovertible facts are certain, unquestionably true, and impossible to doubt however hard you might try to convince yourself otherwise.

incorrigible

incorrigible: Someone who is incorrigible has bad habits or does bad things and is unlikely to ever change; this word is often used in a humorous way.

inculcate

inculcate: To inculcate is to fix an idea or belief in someone's mind by repeatedly teaching it.

incumbent

incumbent: If it is incumbent upon you to do something, it is your duty or responsibility to do it.

indefatigable

indefatigable: If someone is indefatigable, they never shows signs of getting tired.

indelible

indelible: If someone leaves an indelible impression on you, it will not be forgotten; an indelible mark is permanent or impossible to erase or remove.

indemnify

indemnify: If you indemnify someone against something bad happening, you promise to protect them from financial loss or legal responsibility if it happens.

indigenous

indigenous: Living things are indigenous to a region or country if they originated there, rather than coming from another area of the world.

indigent

indigent: An indigent person is very poor.

indiscreet

indiscreet: Someone who is indiscreet shows lack of judgment, especially because they say or do things in public that should only be said or done privately—if at all.

indoctrinate

indoctrinate: If you indoctrinate someone, you teach them a set of beliefs so thoroughly that they reject any other beliefs or ideas without any critical thought.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 22, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

indolent

indolent: An indolent person is lazy.

inebriated

inebriated: An inebriated person has had too much alcohol.

ineffable

ineffable: The adjective ineffable refers to something that is so impressive and beautiful that you cannot describe it in words.

ineluctable

ineluctable: Something that is ineluctable is impossible to avoid or escape, however much you try.

inequitable

inequitable: If you say something is inequitable, you are saying that it is unjust because it is not equally fair for everyone.

inert

inert: When something is inert, it has no power of movement or is inactive.

inestimable

inestimable: Something that has inestimable value or benefit has so much of it that it cannot be calculated.

inexorable

inexorable: The adjective inexorable describes a process that is impossible to stop once it has begun.

infallible

infallible: If something is infallible, it is never wrong and so is incapable of making mistakes.

ingenuous

ingenuous: People who are ingenuous are excessively trusting and believe almost everything that people tell them, especially because they have not had much life experience.

ingrate

ingrate: If you describe someone as an ingrate, you are criticizing them because they do not express thanks to someone who has helped them—they are ungrateful.

ingratiate

ingratiate: If people try to ingratiate themselves with you, they try to get your approval by doing or saying things that they think will please you.

ingress

ingress: Ingress is the action of entering a place, the entrance itself, or the right or permission to enter a place.

inimical

inimical: If someone is inimical, they are unfriendly and will likely cause you harm.

inimitable

inimitable: Someone, such as a performer or athlete, is inimitable when they are so good or unique in their talent that it is unlikely anyone else can be their equal.

injunction

injunction: An injunction is a court order that prevents someone from doing something.

innocuous

innocuous: Something innocuous is not likely to offend or harm anyone.

inordinate

inordinate: If something is inordinate, it is much larger in amount or degree than is normally expected.

insatiable

insatiable: If someone has an insatiable desire for something she always wants more of it and never feels that she has enough.

inscrutable

inscrutable: Something inscrutable is very hard to figure out, discover, or understand what it is all about.

insidious

insidious: Something that is insidious is dangerous because it seems harmless or not important; nevertheless, over time it gradually develops the capacity to cause harm and damage.

insinuation

insinuation: If someone makes an insinuation, they say something bad or unpleasant in a sly and indirect way.

insipid

insipid: Something insipid is dull, boring, and has no interesting features; for example, insipid food has no taste or little flavor.

insouciance

insouciance: Insouciance is a lack of concern or worry for something that should be shown more careful attention or consideration.

insular

insular: If someone is insular, they are either unwilling to meet anyone outside their own small group or they are not interested in learning new ideas.

interdict

interdict: An interdict is an official order that prevents someone from doing something.

interlocutor

interlocutor: An interlocutor is the person with whom you are having a (usually formal) conversation or discussion.

interminable

interminable: Something that is interminable continues for a very long time in a boring or annoying way.

internecine

internecine: An internecine conflict or quarrel takes place between people who belong to the same group, organization, country, etc.

interpolate

interpolate: If you interpolate words into a piece of writing, you insert those words into it; such altering of the text could falsify it.

interregnum

interregnum: An interregnum is a period of time when there is temporarily no one in charge of a country or large organization.

intestate

intestate: If you die intestate you die without having made a will or legal document that explains who gets your money and property.

intone

intone: If someone is intoning something, they are saying it in a slow and serious way without making their voice rise or fall.

intractable

intractable: Intractable problems, situations, or people are very difficult or impossible to deal with.

intransigent

intransigent: An intransigent person is stubborn; thus, they refuse to change their ideas or behavior, often in a way that seems unreasonable.

intrepid

intrepid: An intrepid person is willing to do dangerous things or go to dangerous places because they are brave.

intrinsic

intrinsic: An intrinsic characteristic of something is the basic and essential feature that makes it what it is.

introspective

introspective: If someone is introspective, they spend a lot of time examining their own feelings, thoughts, or ideas.

inundate

inundate: If you are inundated with something, you have so much of it that you cannot easily deal with it; likewise, if too much rain inundates an area, it causes flooding.

inured

inured: If you are inured to something unpleasant you have become so used to it that it no longer affects you.

inveigh

inveigh: If you inveigh against something, you criticize it very strongly.

inveigle

inveigle: If you inveigle somebody, you cleverly manipulate them—usually by flattery or persuasion—to do something for you that they don't want to do.

inveterate

inveterate: An inveterate person is always doing a particular thing, especially something questionable—and they are not likely to stop doing it.

invidious

invidious: An action is invidious when it is done with the intention of creating harm or producing envy or hatred in others.

irascible

irascible: An irascible person becomes angry very easily.

iridescent

iridescent: An iridescent object has many bright colors that change in different types of light.

irreconcilable

irreconcilable: Two irreconcilable opinions or points of view are so opposed to each other that it is not possible to accept both of them or reach a settlement between them.

irrefutable

irrefutable: An irrefutable argument or statement cannot be proven wrong; therefore, it must be accepted because it is certain.

irreproachable

irreproachable: An irreproachable person is very honest and so morally upright that their behavior cannot be criticized.

irresolute

irresolute: Someone who is irresolute is unable to decide what to do.

irrevocable

irrevocable: An irrevocable action or decision is impossible to change, reverse, or stop.

itinerant

itinerant: When someone is described as itinerant, they are characterized by traveling or moving about from place to place.

jaundiced

jaundiced: If someone has a jaundiced view of something, they ignore the good parts and can only see the bad aspects of it.

jejune

jejune: If you describe ideas as jejune, you are saying they are childish and uninteresting; the adjective jejune also describes those having little experience, maturity, or knowledge.

jettison

jettison: If you jettison something, you get rid of it because you think it is not useful or appropriate.

jingoism

jingoism: Jingoism is excessive nationalism, including the strong belief that your country is better than other countries.

jocular

jocular: Someone who is jocular is cheerful and often makes jokes or tries to make people laugh.

juggernaut

juggernaut: A juggernaut is a very powerful force, organization, or group whose influence cannot be stopped; its strength and power can overwhelm or crush any competition or anything else that stands in its way.

juxtaposition

juxtaposition: The juxtaposition of two objects is the act of positioning them side by side so that the differences between them are more readily visible.

kitsch

kitsch: Kitsch is cheap and showy art that sometimes amuses people because of its bad taste; it is often an inferior imitation of existing sophisticated art styles that have true value.

laborious

laborious: A laborious job or process takes a long time, requires a lot of effort, and is often boring.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 26, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

labyrinthine

labyrinthine: If you describe a situation or process as labyrinthine, you mean that it is very complicated, involved, and difficult to understand.

lacerate

lacerate: If something lacerates you, it makes a deep cut into your flesh.

lachrymose

lachrymose: If someone is lachrymose, they tend to cry often; if something, such as a song, is lachrymose, it tends to cause tears because it is so sad.

lackadaisical

lackadaisical: If you do something in a lackadaisical way, you do it carelessly and without putting much effort into it—thereby showing that you are not really interested in what you're doing.

lackey

lackey: A lackey is a person who follows their superior's orders so completely that they never openly question those commands.

laconic

laconic: A person who is being laconic uses very few words to say something.

lacuna

lacuna: A lacuna is an empty space or gap where something is missing; if there is a lacuna in a person's argument, for example, part of that argument is lacking.

languid

languid: A languid person is slow, relaxed, and shows little energy or interest in doing anything.

largess

largess: Largess is the generous act of giving money or presents to a large number of people.

lassitude

lassitude: Lassitude is a state of tiredness, lack of energy, and having little interest in what's going on around you.

latent

latent: Something that is latent, such as an undiscovered talent or undiagnosed disease, exists but is not active or has not developed at the moment—it may develop or become active in the future.

latitude

latitude: If you are given latitude to do something, you have the freedom to choose your method and exercise your own judgment in doing it—as opposed to someone else's telling you how to go about it.

lattice

lattice: A lattice is a pattern or structure that has parallel sets of lines of material crossing each other, often at right angles.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 18, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

laudatory

laudatory: A laudatory article or speech expresses praise or admiration for someone or something.

lethargic

lethargic: If you are lethargic, you are tired, lack energy, and are unwilling to exert effort.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 13, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

leviathan

leviathan: A leviathan is something that is very large, powerful, difficult to control, and rather frightening.

levity

levity: Levity is an amusing way of speaking or behaving during a serious situation; it can lighten the moment but can also be considered inappropriate.

lexicon

lexicon: The lexicon of a particular subject or language is all the words, phrases, and terms associated with it.

liaison

liaison: Liaison is the cooperation and exchange of information between people or organizations so that they can work well together.

lien

lien: A lien placed by a creditor on a debtor's property is a claim or legal right to keep or sell that property if the debtor cannot—or does not—repay their debt.

limber

limber: Someone who is limber can stretch, move, or bend themselves in many different directions or ways.

lineament

lineament: A lineament is the characteristic property or distinguishing feature of something; a person's lineaments are the outlines or contours of their face or body.

lionize

lionize: When someone is lionized, they are treated as being very important or famous—although they may not deserve to be.

liquidate

liquidate: To liquidate a business or company is to close it down and sell the things that belong to it in order to pay off its debts.

listless

listless: When you are listless, you lack energy and interest and are unwilling to exert any effort.

litany

litany: A litany is a long and usually boring list of things, such as complaints or problems that someone talks or writes about.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 18, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

lithe

lithe: Someone with a lithe body can move easily and gracefully.

littoral

littoral: The adjective littoral is a geographical term that refers to the coastal or shore region of a lake, sea, or ocean.

livid

livid: If you are livid, you are extremely angry.

loquacious

loquacious: Someone who is loquacious talks too much.

lucid

lucid: If someone is lucid, they are able to understand things and think clearly; this adjective is especially used when someone was not always able to do this because of illness or confusion.

lucrative

lucrative: If a business is lucrative, it makes a lot of money.

ludicrous

ludicrous: If you describe something as ludicrous, you mean that it is extremely silly, stupid, or just plain ridiculous.

lugubrious

lugubrious: If someone is lugubrious, they are looking very sad or gloomy.

luminary

luminary: A luminary is someone who is much admired in a particular profession because they are an accomplished expert in their field.

luminous

luminous: When something is luminous, it is bright and glowing.

lustrous

lustrous: Something that is lustrous shines in a soft and gentle way by reflecting light.

luxuriant

luxuriant: Something that is luxuriant, such as plants or hair, is growing well and is very healthy.

machination

machination: A machination is a secretive plan or clever plot that is carefully designed to control events or people.

macrocosm

macrocosm: A macrocosm is a large, complex, and organized system or structure that is made of many small parts that form one unit, such as a society or the universe.

magnanimity

magnanimity: If someone exhibits magnanimity towards another, they show them kindness and noble generosity, especially after defeating them in battle or after having been treated badly by them.

magnate

magnate: A magnate is a rich and powerful person in an industry or business.

malady

malady: A malady is a serious illness; it can also be used to refer to serious and widespread problems within a society or an organization.

malaise

malaise: Malaise is a feeling of discontent, general unease, or even illness in a person or group for which there does not seem to be a quick and easy solution because the cause of it is not clear.

malapropism

malapropism: A malapropism is an unintentional and usually humorous mistake you make when you use a word that sounds similar to the word you actually intended to use but means something completely different.

maleficent

maleficent: Something or someone that is maleficent deliberately tries to cause harm or evil.

malevolent

malevolent: A malevolent person or thing is evil due to deliberate attempts to cause harm.

malfeasance

malfeasance: Malfeasance is an unlawful act, especially one committed by a trusted public official.

malice

malice: Malice is the strong desire to harm someone physically or emotionally because you hate them.

You checked "I Know This" on Feb 12, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

malign

malign: If you malign someone, you say unpleasant things about them to damage their reputation.

malinger

malinger: If someone is malingering he or she is trying to avoid work by pretending to be ill.

malleable

malleable: Someone who is malleable is easily influenced or controlled by other people.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 18, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

manacle

manacle: A manacle is a circular, usually metallic device used to chain someone's wrists and/or ankles together.

martinet

martinet: A martinet is a very strict person who demands that people obey rules exactly.

matriarch

matriarch: A matriarch is an older and powerful woman who controls a family, community, or other social group.

maudlin

maudlin: A maudlin person talks in a sad, silly, and overly emotional way, perhaps because they have had too much to drink.

mawkish

mawkish: Something is mawkish when it is overly sentimental and silly in an embarrassing way.

mediocre

mediocre: Something that is mediocre is just average or adequate in quality.

medley

medley: A medley is a collection of various things, such as different tunes in a song or different types of food in a meal.

megalomania

megalomania: Megalomania is the false belief someone has that they are very powerful and have control over other people's lives, a condition that sometimes occurs due to mental illness.

melancholy

melancholy: If you are melancholy, you look and feel sad.

melange

melange: A melange is a collection of different kinds of things.

melee

melee: A melee is a noisy, confusing, hand-to-hand fight involving a good number of people.

mellifluous

mellifluous: A mellifluous voice or piece of music is gentle and pleasant to listen to.

mendacious

mendacious: A mendacious person does not tell the truth.

mercurial

mercurial: A mercurial person's mind or mood changes often, quickly, and unpredictably.

meretricious

meretricious: Something meretricious seems good and useful; in fact, it’s just showy and does not have much value at all.

mesmerize

mesmerize: If something mesmerizes you, it attracts or holds your interest so much that you do not pay attention to anything else.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 19, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

metamorphosis

metamorphosis: When someone or something undergoes the process of metamorphosis, there is a change in appearance, character, or even physical shape.

metaphor

metaphor: A metaphor is a word or phrase that means one thing but is used to describe something else in order to highlight similar qualities; for example, if someone is very brave, you might say that they have the heart of a lion.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 16, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

meteoric

meteoric: If you describe someone's path through life as meteoric, it means that they have become very successful extremely quickly.

meticulous

meticulous: Someone is considered meticulous when they act with careful attention to detail.

mettle

mettle: Someone's mettle is their courageous determination and spirited ability to deal with problems or difficult situations.

microcosm

microcosm: A microcosm is a small group, place, or activity that has all the same qualities as a much larger one; therefore, it seems like a smaller version of it.

milieu

milieu: Your milieu includes the things and people that surround you and influence the way in which you behave.

mimetic

mimetic: If you engage in mimetic behavior, you copy the movements or appearance of someone or something else.

minion

minion: A minion is an unimportant person who merely obeys the orders of someone else; they usually perform boring tasks that require little skill.

minuscule

minuscule: Something minuscule is extremely small in size or amount.

minutiae

minutiae: The minutiae of something, such as your job or life, are the very small and often unimportant details associated with it.

misanthrope

misanthrope: A misanthrope is someone who hates and mistrusts people.

misconstrue

misconstrue: If you misconstrue something that has been said or something that happens, you understand or interpret it incorrectly.

missive

missive: A missive is a written letter, especially a formal, legal, or important one.

mitigate

mitigate: If you mitigate something that causes harm, you reduce the harmful or painful effects of it.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 19, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

modicum

modicum: A modicum is a small amount of something, especially a good quality.

moiety

moiety: A moiety is one of approximately two equal halves, shares, or portions of something that can be or has already been divided.

mollify

mollify: If you mollify someone, you say or do something to make that person feel less angry or upset.

monolith

monolith: An organization or system that is a monolith is extremely large; additionally, it is unwilling or very slow to change or adopt something new.

moratorium

moratorium: A moratorium on a particular activity or process is an official agreement to stop it temporarily.

moribund

moribund: If you describe something as moribund, you imply that it is no longer effective; it may also be coming to the end of its useful existence.

morose

morose: Someone who is morose is unhappy, bad-tempered, and unwilling to talk very much.

motley

motley: A collection of things is motley if its parts are so different that they do not seem to belong in the same space; groups of widely variegated people can also be described as motley.

mottled

mottled: Something that is mottled is covered with spots or patches of different, random colors which are not in any particular pattern.

mountebank

mountebank: A mountebank is a smooth-talking, dishonest person who tricks and cheats people.

multifarious

multifarious: Something that is multifarious is made up of many kinds of different things.

mundane

mundane: Something that is mundane is very ordinary and not interesting or exciting, especially because it happens very often.

munificent

munificent: A munificent person is extremely generous, especially with money.

myopic

myopic: A myopic person is unable to visualize the long-term negative consequences of their current actions; rather, they are narrowly focused upon short-term results.

You checked "I Know This" on Aug 6, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

myriad

myriad: If you have a myriad of things, you have so many and such a great variety of them that it's hard or impossible to keep track of or count them all.

nadir

nadir: The nadir of a situation is its lowest point.

narcissism

narcissism: Narcissism is the habit of always thinking about yourself and constantly admiring your own appearance or qualities.

nascent

nascent: Something that is nascent is just starting to develop and is expected to become stronger and bigger in time.

You checked "I Know This" on Jun 24, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

nebulous

nebulous: If you describe something as nebulous, you mean that it is unclear, vague, and not clearly defined; a shape that is nebulous has no clear boundaries.

nefarious

nefarious: A nefarious activity is considered evil and highly dishonest.

neologism

neologism: A neologism is a new word or expression in a language or an existing word used with a new meaning.

neophyte

neophyte: A neophyte is a person who is just beginning to learn a subject or skill—or how to do an activity of some kind.

nepotism

nepotism: Nepotism is the unfair use of power to show special favor, such as giving jobs or benefits to family and friends.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 20, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

nettle

nettle: If you nettle someone, you irritate or annoy them.

nexus

nexus: A nexus is a connection or a series of connections between a number of people, things, or ideas that often form the center of a system or situation.

niggling

niggling: A niggling feeling is slight and not really serious but irritates or bothers you over a long period of time.

nihilism

nihilism: Nihilism is the belief that nothing in life has any importance or value, including all social institutions, and that existence is senseless or useless.

noisome

noisome: If something is noisome, it is extremely unpleasant, especially because it is very dirty or has an awful smell.

nonchalant

nonchalant: Someone who is nonchalant is very relaxed and appears not to be worried about anything.

nondescript

nondescript: Something is nondescript when its appearance is ordinary, dull, and not at all interesting or attractive.

nonpareil

nonpareil: Something nonpareil has no equal because it is much better than all others of its kind or type.

nonpartisan

nonpartisan: A person or group is nonpartisan when it does not support the ideas of any particular political party or group.

nonplussed

nonplussed: If you are nonplussed, you are so surprised and confused that you are not sure what to do or say.

nostalgic

nostalgic: If you feel nostalgic about a happy time in the past, you are feeling sad when you think about it and wish that things had not changed or long for their return.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 20, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

notional

notional: Something that is notional exists only as an idea or in theory—not in reality.

noxious

noxious: Something that is noxious is harmful, extremely unpleasant, and often poisonous.

nuance

nuance: A nuance is a small difference in something that may be difficult to notice but is fairly important.

numinous

numinous: Numinous objects or places seem holy, spiritual, and possess a mysterious power, which make you feel that a spirit or god may be present.

obdurate

obdurate: Someone who is obdurate is stubborn, unreasonable, or uncontrollable; hence, they simply refuse to change their behavior, actions, or beliefs to fit any situation whatsoever.

obfuscate

obfuscate: To obfuscate something is to make it deliberately unclear, confusing, and difficult to understand.

objective

objective: If someone is objective, they base their opinions on facts rather than personal feelings or beliefs.

oblivious

oblivious: If you are oblivious to something that is happening, you do not notice it.

obsequious

obsequious: If someone is being obsequious, they are trying so hard to please someone that they lack sincerity in their actions towards that person.

obsolescent

obsolescent: If something is obsolescent, it is slowly becoming no longer needed because something newer or more effective has been invented.

obstinate

obstinate: An obstinate person refuses to change their mind, even when other people think they are being highly unreasonable.

obstreperous

obstreperous: Someone who is obstreperous is noisy, unruly, and difficult to control.

obtrude

obtrude: If something obtrudes, it becomes noticeable or attracts attention in a way that is not pleasant or welcome.

obtuse

obtuse: Someone is obtuse when they are slow to understand things; someone can choose to be obtuse when they deliberately do not try to figure things out.

obverse

obverse: Something is obverse when it is facing or turned towards the observer, such as the facing side of a coin.

obviate

obviate: To obviate a problem is to eliminate it or do something that makes solving the problem unnecessary.

occlude

occlude: If something, such as a road, is occluded, it has been closed off or blocked; therefore, cars are prevented from continuing on their way until the road is opened once again.

odious

odious: If you describe people or things as odious, you think that they are extremely unpleasant.

officious

officious: An officious person acts in a self-important manner; therefore, they are very eager to offer unwanted advice or services—which makes them annoying.

omnibus

omnibus: An omnibus is a book containing a collection of stories or articles that have previously been printed separately.

omniscient

omniscient: Someone who is omniscient seems to know absolutely everything.

onerous

onerous: A task or responsibility is onerous if you dislike having to do it because it is difficult or tiring.

opaque

opaque: Something is opaque if it is either difficult to understand or is not transparent.

You checked "I Know This" on May 22, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

opine

opine: To opine is to state your opinion on something.

opprobrium

opprobrium: Opprobrium is strong criticism of something that someone has done, especially when expressed publicly; it is also the shame that arises from such an activity.

opulent

opulent: Something that is opulent is very impressive, grand, and is made from expensive materials.

opus

opus: An opus is an important piece of artistic work by a writer, painter, musician, etc.; an opus can also be one in a series of numbered musical works by the same composer.

ornate

ornate: An ornate object is heavily or excessively decorated with complicated shapes and patterns.

oscillate

oscillate: If an object oscillates, it moves repeatedly from one point to another and then back again; if you oscillate between two moods or attitudes, you keep changing from one to the other.

You checked "I Know This" on May 29, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

ossify

ossify: If a belief, idea, system, or organization ossifies, it becomes fixed and unwilling to change.

ostensible

ostensible: Something that is ostensible appears to be true or is officially declared to be true but is really a cover for the actual truth of a situation.

ostentatious

ostentatious: If you describe an action as ostentatious, you think it is an extreme and exaggerated way of impressing people.

ostracize

ostracize: If someone is ostracized from a group, its members deliberately refuse to talk or listen to them and do not allow them to take part in any of their social activities.

otiose

otiose: Something that is otiose is unnecessary, worthless, ineffective, or impractical; an otiose person is lazy and thus ineffective.

overt

overt: An overt act is not hidden or secret but is done in an open and public way.

overweening

overweening: Someone is overweening when they are not modest; rather, they think way too much of themselves and let everyone know about it.

palatable

palatable: If you describe something as palatable, such as an idea or suggestion, you believe that people will accept it; palatable food or drink is agreeable to the taste.

palliative

palliative: A palliative action makes a bad situation seem better; nevertheless, it does not actually solve the problem.

pallid

pallid: If someone is pallid, they look very pale in an unattractive and unhealthy way.

palpable

palpable: If a mood or feeling is palpable, it is so strong and intense that it is easily noticed and is almost able to be physically felt.

panacea

panacea: A panacea is something that people think will solve all problems and make everything better.

panache

panache: If you do something with panache, you do it in a way that shows great skill, style, and confidence.

pandemonium

pandemonium: Pandemonium is a very noisy and uncontrolled situation, especially one that is caused by a lot of angry or excited people.

panegyric

panegyric: A panegyric is a speech or article that praises someone or something a lot.

panoply

panoply: A panoply is a large and impressive collection of people or things.

pantheon

pantheon: The best or most highly regarded members of a particular group are known as a pantheon.

paradigm

paradigm: A paradigm is a model or example of something that shows how something works or how it can be produced.

paradox

paradox: A paradox is a statement that appears to be self-contradictory or unrealistic but may surprisingly express a possible truth.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 15, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

paragon

paragon: A paragon is an example of a thing or person at its or their very best.

pare

pare: To pare something down is to reduce or lessen it.

pariah

pariah: A pariah is a social outcast.

parlance

parlance: You are applying parlance when you use words or expressions that are used by a particular group of people who have a unique way of speaking; for example, "descendants" is often used in place of "children" in legal parlance.

parochial

parochial: Someone has a parochial outlook when they are mostly concerned with narrow or limited issues that affect a small, local area or a very specific cause; they are also unconcerned with wider or more general issues.

parody

parody: A parody is a humorous imitation of more serious writing or music.

paroxysm

paroxysm: A paroxysm is a sudden uncontrolled expression of emotion or a short attack of pain, coughing, or shaking.

parry

parry: To parry is to ward something off or deflect it.

parsimonious

parsimonious: A parsimonious person is not willing to give or spend money.

pastiche

pastiche: A pastiche is a piece of writing, music, or film, etc. that is deliberately made in the style of other works; it can also use a variety of such copied material in order to laugh in a gentle way at those works.

patent

patent: A patent situation is one that is wide open and unconcealed; it is both evident and obvious.

pathogen

pathogen: A pathogen is an organism, such as a bacterium or virus, that causes disease.

patina

patina: A patina is a smooth, shiny film or surface that gradually develops on things—such as wood, leather, and metal utensils—that have seen a lot of use.

patois

patois: A patois is a form of language used by a people in a small area that is different from the national or standard language.

patriarch

patriarch: A patriarch is a male leader of a family or tribe; a patriarch can also be a man who is the founder of a group or organization.

patronize

patronize: If people patronize you, they talk or behave in a way that seems friendly; nevertheless, they also show that they think they are more intelligent or important than you are.

paucity

paucity: A paucity of something is not enough of it.

peccadillo

peccadillo: A peccadillo is a slight or minor offense that can be overlooked.

pecuniary

pecuniary: Pecuniary means relating to or concerning money.

pedagogy

pedagogy: The art of pedagogy is the methods used by a teacher to teach a subject.

pedantic

pedantic: If someone is pedantic, they give too much importance to unimportant details and formal rules.

pedestrian

pedestrian: If you describe something as pedestrian, you think that it is ordinary and not interesting.

pejorative

pejorative: A pejorative word, phrase, or expression expresses a bad opinion of someone or something.

pellucid

pellucid: Something that is pellucid is either extremely clear because it is transparent to the eye or it is very easy for the mind to understand.

penchant

penchant: If you have a penchant for some activity, you have a strong fondness for it and thus find it enjoyable.

pensive

pensive: If you are pensive, you are deeply thoughtful, often in a sad and/or serious way.

penury

penury: Penury is the state of being extremely poor.

peregrination

peregrination: A peregrination is a long journey or act of traveling from place to place, especially by foot.

perennial

perennial: Something that is perennial lasts a very long time and is enduring.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 17, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

perfidious

perfidious: Someone who is perfidious is not loyal and cannot be trusted.

perfunctory

perfunctory: A perfunctory action is done with little care or interest; consequently, it is only completed because it is expected of someone to do so.

peripatetic

peripatetic: If someone leads a peripatetic life, they travel from place to place, living and working only for a short time in each place before moving on.

permeate

permeate: When a substance permeates something, it enters into all parts of it.

pernicious

pernicious: Something that is pernicious is very harmful or evil, often in a way that is hidden or not quickly noticed.

peroration

peroration: A peroration is a long speech that sounds impressive but does not have much substance.

perspicacity

perspicacity: Someone who demonstrates perspicacity notices or understands things very quickly.

pertinacious

pertinacious: Someone who is pertinacious is determined to continue doing something rather than giving up—even when it gets very difficult.

pertinent

pertinent: Something that is pertinent is directly related or relevant to the subject under consideration.

peruse

peruse: If you peruse some written text, you read it over carefully.

pervasive

pervasive: If something is pervasive, it appears to be everywhere.

petulant

petulant: A petulant person behaves in an unreasonable and childish way, especially because they cannot get their own way or what they want.

philanthropy

philanthropy: Philanthropy is unselfish support in the form of donating money, work, or gifts to positive social purposes; philanthropy is also overall love for humans in general.

phlegmatic

phlegmatic: Someone who is phlegmatic stays calm and unemotional even in dangerous or exciting situations.

pillage

pillage: If soldiers pillage a place, such as a town or museum, they steal a lot of things and damage it using violent methods.

pillory

pillory: If someone is pilloried, they are publicly criticized or ridiculed by a lot of people, especially in the media.

pinnacle

pinnacle: If someone reaches a pinnacle of something—such as a career or mountain—they have arrived at the highest point of it.

piquant

piquant: Something that is piquant is interesting and exciting; food that is piquant is pleasantly spicy.

pithy

pithy: A pithy statement or piece of writing is brief but intelligent; it is also precise and to the point.

pittance

pittance: If you say that you've received a pittance, you mean that you received a small amount of something—and you know that you deserved more.

pivotal

pivotal: Something that is pivotal is more important than anything else in a situation or a system; consequently, it is the key to its success.

plagiarism

plagiarism: Plagiarism is the copying of another person's work, ideas, or words and pretending that you created or thought of them.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 17, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

plaintive

plaintive: A plaintive sound or voice expresses sadness.

plangent

plangent: Plangent sounds are loud and tend to suggest sadness.

plastic

plastic: A person who is plastic can be easily influenced and molded by others.

platitude

platitude: A platitude is an unoriginal statement that has been used so many times that it is considered almost meaningless and pointless, even though it is presented as important.

plaudit

plaudit: If you receive a plaudit, you receive admiration, praise, and approval from someone.

plenary

plenary: A plenary session or meeting is attended by all members of an organization.

plenipotentiary

plenipotentiary: A plenipotentiary is someone who has full power to take action or make decisions on behalf of their government in a foreign country.

plethora

plethora: A plethora of something is too much of it.

pliant

pliant: Something that is pliant is adaptable and can bend easily without breaking.

pluck

pluck: If someone has pluck, she or he has determination and courage.

plummet

plummet: If something plummets, it falls down from a high position very quickly; for example, a piano can plummet from a window and a stock value can plummet during a market crash.

poignant

poignant: Something that is poignant affects you deeply and makes you feel sad or full of pity.

polemic

polemic: A polemic is a strong written or spoken statement that usually attacks or less often defends a particular idea, opinion, or belief.

politic

politic: To be politic in a decision is to be socially wise and diplomatic.

polyglot

polyglot: A polyglot is someone who can speak or understand many languages.

polymath

polymath: A polymath is a person who knows a great deal about many different subjects.

ponderous

ponderous: Ponderous writing or speech is boring, highly serious, and seems very long and wordy; it definitely lacks both grace and style.

pontificate

pontificate: When someone pontificates, they give their opinions in a heavy-handed way that shows they think they are always right.

portent

portent: A portent is a warning that indicates what is likely to happen in the future, which is usually something unpleasant.

poseur

poseur: A poseur pretends to have a certain quality or social position, usually because they want to influence others in some way.

postulate

postulate: If you postulate something, you assert that it is true without proof; therefore, it can be used as a basis for argument or reasoning—even though there is no factual basis for the assumption.

potable

potable: Potable water is clean and safe to drink.

You checked "I Know This" on May 10, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

potentate

potentate: A potentate is a ruler who has great power over people.

pragmatic

pragmatic: If you handle something in a pragmatic way, you deal with it in a realistic and practical manner rather than just following unproven theories or ideas.

prattle

prattle: Prattle is mindless chatter that seems like it will never stop.

precarious

precarious: A precarious situation or state can very quickly become dangerous without warning.

precept

precept: A precept is a rule or principle that teaches correct behavior.

precipitate

precipitate: To precipitate something is to bring it about before its time or very quickly.

precocious

precocious: A precocious child shows advanced intelligence or skill at an unusually young age.

precursor

precursor: A first event is a precursor to a second event if the first event is responsible for the development or existence of the second.

predilection

predilection: If you have a predilection for something, you have a preference for it.

preen

preen: Animals preen when they smooth out their fur or their feathers; humans preen by making themselves beautiful in front of a mirror.

prefatory

prefatory: Prefatory comments refer to an introduction to a book or speech.

preponderance

preponderance: A preponderance of things of a particular type in a group means that there are more of that type than of any other.

presage

presage: To presage a future event is to give a sign or warning that something (usually) bad is about to happen.

prescient

prescient: Someone who is prescient knows or is able to predict what will happen in the future.

presumptuous

presumptuous: When you are presumptuous, you act improperly, rudely, or without respect, especially while attempting to do something that is not socially acceptable or that you are not qualified to do.

prevaricate

prevaricate: If you prevaricate, you avoid giving a direct or honest answer, usually because you want to hide the truth or want to delay or avoid making a hard decision.

primordial

primordial: The adjective primordial is used to describe things that existed close to the formation of Earth or close to the origin or development of something.

pristine

pristine: Something that is pristine has not lost any of its original perfection or purity.

privation

privation: If you suffer privation, you live without many of the basic things required for a comfortable life.

probity

probity: Probity is very moral and honest behavior.

proclivity

proclivity: A proclivity is the tendency to behave in a particular way or to like a particular thing.

prodigal

prodigal: Someone who behaves in a prodigal way spends a lot of money and/or time carelessly and wastefully with no concern for the future.

prodigious

prodigious: Something that is prodigious is very large, impressive, or great.

profligate

profligate: Someone who is profligate is lacking in restraint, which can manifest in carelessly and wastefully using resources, such as energy or money; this kind of person can also act in an immoral way.

profundity

profundity: When someone exhibits profundity, they display great intellectual depth and understanding; profundity can also be the depth or complexity of something.

profusion

profusion: A profusion of something is a very large quantity or variety of it.

progeny

progeny: Progeny are children or descendants.

prognosticate

prognosticate: To prognosticate is to predict or forecast something.

proliferate

proliferate: If something proliferates, it grows and spreads quickly so that there is a great abundance of it.

prolific

prolific: Something or someone that is prolific is highly fruitful and so produces a lot of something.

You checked "I Know This" on May 8, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

prolix

prolix: Something that is prolix, such as a lecture or speech, is excessively wordy; consequently, it can be tiresome to read or listen to.

propensity

propensity: A propensity is a natural tendency towards a particular behavior.

prophetic

prophetic: Something or someone that is prophetic has the quality or ability to predict the future.

prophylactic

prophylactic: A prophylactic is used as a preventative or protective agent to keep someone free from disease or infection.

propinquity

propinquity: The propinquity of a thing is its nearness in location, relationship, or similarity to another thing.

propitiate

propitiate: To propitiate another is to calm or soothe them; it is often giving someone what they want so that everyone is happy.

propitious

propitious: Something that is propitious shows favorable conditions.

propriety

propriety: Propriety is behaving in a socially acceptable and appropriate way.

prosaic

prosaic: Something prosaic is dull, boring, and ordinary.

proscribe

proscribe: When someone proscribes an activity, they prohibit it by establishing a rule against it.

proselytize

proselytize: A person who proselytizes tries to draw others to adopt their religion, beliefs, or causes.

protagonist

protagonist: A protagonist is the main character in a play, novel, or real event such as a battle or struggle.

You checked "I Know This" on May 15, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

protean

protean: Something or someone that is protean is adaptable, variable, or changeable in nature.

protege

protege: A protege is a promising young person who has been taught, guided, and helped over a period of time by an older and more experienced person.

protracted

protracted: Something protracted is lengthened in its duration.

protuberance

protuberance: A protuberance is an outgrowth, lump, or swelling of some kind.

provenance

provenance: The provenance of something is its birthplace or the place from which it originally came.

providential

providential: A providential event is a very lucky one because it happens at exactly the right time and often when it is needed most.

puerile

puerile: A puerile person is childish, immature, and foolish.

pugnacious

pugnacious: To act in a pugnacious manner is to act in a combative and aggressive way.

punctilious

punctilious: To be punctilious is to pay precise attention to detail.

punctuate

punctuate: If an activity is punctuated by something, it is interrupted or emphasized by it at intervals.

pungent

pungent: Something pungent, such as a spice, aroma, or speech, is sharp and penetrating.

You checked "I Know This" on Jun 26, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

punitive

punitive: A punitive action is intended to punish someone.

purgative

purgative: A purgative agent completely cleans something out.

purloin

purloin: To purloin is to steal.

purvey

purvey: To purvey is to supply with food or goods.

purview

purview: Something that is within the purview of an individual or organization is within the range of its operation, authority, control, or concerns that it deals with.

pusillanimous

pusillanimous: To be pusillanimous is to be cowardly.

putative

putative: Something putative is supposed to be real; for example, a putative leader is one who everyone assumes is the leader—even though they may not be in reality.

putrefy

putrefy: Something that has putrefied has decayed and emits a bad odor.

pyrrhic

pyrrhic: A Pyrrhic victory is one that comes at a high cost for the winners of the battle.

quack

quack: A quack is someone who pretends to be qualified to do something, but really is not.

quaff

quaff: To quaff is to gulp down a drink.

quagmire

quagmire: A quagmire is a difficult and complicated situation that is not easy to avoid or get out of.

qualm

qualm: If you have qualms about doing something, you are having doubts about it because you are worried that it might be the wrong thing to do.

quandary

quandary: If you are in a quandary, you are in a difficult situation in which you have to make a decision but don't know what to do.

quarantine

quarantine: When people or animals are quarantined, they are put in isolation so that they will not spread disease.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 22, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

quaver

quaver: To quaver is to shake or tremble, especially when speaking.

quell

quell: To quell something is to stamp out, quiet, or overcome it.

querulous

querulous: Someone who is querulous often complains about things in an annoying way.

quiescence

quiescence: A state of quiescence is one of quiet and restful inaction.

quintessential

quintessential: Something is quintessential when it is a perfect example of its type.

quixotic

quixotic: Quixotic plans or ideas are not very practical or realistic; they are often based on unreasonable hopes for improving the world.

quorum

quorum: A quorum is the smallest number of people in a group, usually just over fifty percent, that is needed to make decisions legally.

quotidian

quotidian: Something that is quotidian is done on a daily basis.

raconteur

raconteur: A raconteur is a person who tells stories with great skill.

ramble

ramble: To ramble is to wander about leisurely, with no specific destination in mind; to ramble while speaking is to talk with no particular aim or point intended.

rampant

rampant: If something bad, such as crime or disease, is rampant, there is a lot of it—and it is increasing in a way that is difficult to control.

rancid

rancid: Something rancid is way past fresh; in fact, it is decomposing quickly and has a bad taste or smell.

rancor

rancor: Rancor is a feeling of bitter ill will or intense dislike towards another person.

rant

rant: To rant is to go on an angry verbal attack.

rapacious

rapacious: If you describe a person's behavior as rapacious, you disapprove of them because they always want more money, goods, or possessions than they really need.

rapport

rapport: If two people have established a good rapport, their connection is such that they have a good understanding of and can communicate well with one other.

rapprochement

rapprochement: Rapprochement is the development of greater understanding and friendliness between two countries or groups of people after a period of unfriendly relations.

rapt

rapt: If someone watches or listens to something with rapt attention, they are so involved with it that they do not notice anything else.

rapturous

rapturous: A rapturous feeling or reaction shows extreme pleasure, excitement, or happiness.

rarefy

rarefy: To rarefy something is to make it less dense.

raucous

raucous: A raucous sound is unpleasantly loud, harsh, and noisy.

ravenous

ravenous: If you are ravenous, you are extremely hungry.

rebuff

rebuff: If you rebuff someone, you give an unfriendly answer to a suggestion or offer of help; you hastily turn that person away.

recalcitrant

recalcitrant: A recalcitrant animal or person is difficult to control and refuses to obey orders—even after stiff punishment.

recant

recant: If you recant, you publicly announce that your once firmly held beliefs or statements were wrong and that you no longer agree with them.

recapitulate

recapitulate: When someone recapitulates, they summarize material or content of some kind by repeating the most important points.

recidivism

recidivism: Recidivism is a falling back into an undesirable activity, especially crime, after one has temporarily stopped doing so.

reciprocate

reciprocate: If you reciprocate, you give something to someone because they have given something similar to you.

recluse

recluse: A recluse is someone who chooses to live alone and deliberately avoids other people.

recognizance

recognizance: A recognizance is a promise or formal bond made to a court that someone will attend all court hearings and will not engage in further illegal activity.

recompense

recompense: When you offer recompense to someone, you give them something, usually money, for the trouble or loss that you have caused them or as payment for their help.

recondite

recondite: Recondite areas of knowledge are those that are very difficult to understand and/or are not known by many people.

reconnoiter

reconnoiter: To reconnoiter an area is to go and get preliminary information about it, especially for military purposes.

recoup

recoup: To recoup is to get back an amount of money you have lost or spent.

rectitude

rectitude: You show rectitude if you behave or conduct yourself in an honest and morally correct manner.

recumbent

recumbent: A recumbent figure or person is lying down.

redolent

redolent: If something is redolent of something else, it has features that make you think of it.

redoubtable

redoubtable: If you describe someone as redoubtable, you have great respect for their power and strength; you may be afraid of them as well.

redound

redound: If an action or situation redounds to your credit or discredit, it gives people a good or poor opinion of you and produces a result that benefits or hurts you.

redress

redress: If you redress a complaint or a bad situation, you correct or improve it for the person who has been wronged, usually by paying them money or offering an apology.

reductive

reductive: If you describe something as reductive, such as an explanation or a theory, you disapprove of it because it describes or explains something in such a simple way that it misses important details.

refractory

refractory: Refractory people deliberately don't obey someone in authority and so are difficult to deal with or control.

refrain

refrain: If you refrain from doing something, you do not do it—even though you want to.

refurbish

refurbish: When you refurbish something, you repair it in order to improve its appearance or function.

regale

regale: If someone regales you, they tell you stories and jokes to entertain you— and they could also serve you a wonderful feast.

regimented

regimented: Something that is regimented is organized and controlled by strict rules.

rejoinder

rejoinder: A rejoinder is a quick answer to a reply or remark that can be rude, angry, clever, or defensive.

rejuvenate

rejuvenate: To rejuvenate someone is to make that person feel young and strong again; to rejuvenate something is to make it like new once more.

relegate

relegate: You relegate someone or something if you give that person or thing a less important position than before.

remedial

remedial: A remedial action is intended to improve or correct something that is lacking in some way, such as one's education or health.

remiss

remiss: When you have been remiss, you have been careless because you did not do something that you should have done.

remnant

remnant: The remnants of something are the small remaining parts of it after the main part has been used or destroyed.

remonstrate

remonstrate: To remonstrate with someone is to tell that person that you strongly disapprove of something they have said or done.

remuneration

remuneration: Someone's remuneration is the payment or other rewards they receive for work completed, goods provided, or services rendered.

renege

renege: If you renege on a deal, agreement, or promise, you do not do what you promised or agreed to do.

reprehensible

reprehensible: If you think a type of behavior or idea is reprehensible, you think that it is very bad, morally wrong, and deserves to be strongly criticized.

reprisal

reprisal: A reprisal is something violent or harmful that you do to punish someone for something bad or unpleasant that they did to you.

reprobate

reprobate: A reprobate has a bad character and behaves in an immoral or improper way.

repudiate

repudiate: If you repudiate something, you state that you do not accept or agree with it and no longer want to be connected with it in any way.

repugnance

repugnance: Repugnance is a strong feeling of dislike for something or someone you find horrible and offensive.

repute

repute: A person's repute is what others think of them; repute can also refer to someone's standing in society.

requisite

requisite: If something is requisite for a purpose, it is needed, appropriate, or necessary for that specific purpose.

rescind

rescind: When someone in power rescinds a law or agreement, they officially end it and state that it is no longer valid.

resilience

resilience: Something or someone that shows resilience is able to recover quickly and easily from unpleasant, difficult, and damaging situations or events.

resonate

resonate: If you say that something, such as an event or a message, resonates with you, you mean that it has an emotional effect or a special meaning for you that is significant.

resounding

resounding: A resounding success, victory, or defeat is very great or complete.

respite

respite: A respite is a short period of rest from work or something troubling.

resplendent

resplendent: People or things that are resplendent are beautiful, bright, and impressive in appearance.

restitution

restitution: Restitution is the formal act of giving something back to the rightful owner that was taken away—or paying them money for the loss of the object.

restive

restive: A restive person is not willing or able to keep still or be patient because they are bored or dissatisfied with something; consequently, they are becoming difficult to control.

reticent

reticent: People who are reticent are unwilling to share information, especially about themselves, their thoughts, or their feelings.

retinue

retinue: A retinue is the group of people, such as friends or servants, who travel with someone important to help and support that person.

retrench

retrench: If governments, companies, or other institutions retrench, they reduce costs and/or decrease the amount that they spend in order to save money.

retribution

retribution: Retribution is severe punishment that someone deserves because they have done something very wrong; it especially refers to punishment or revenge that is carried out by someone other than official authorities.

retrograde

retrograde: A retrograde action causes a return to a condition or situation that is worse instead of better than the present one.

retrospect

retrospect: When you consider something in retrospect, you look back on or think about what happened in the past with the advantage of knowing more now than you did then.

revelry

revelry: Revelry is a festive celebration that includes wild, noisy, and happy dancing, eating, and drinking.

reverie

reverie: A reverie is a state of pleasant dreamlike thoughts that makes you forget what you are doing and what is happening around you.

revile

revile: If something is reviled, it is intensely hated and criticized.

rhetoric

rhetoric: Rhetoric is the skill or art of using language to persuade or influence people, especially language that sounds impressive but may not be sincere or honest.

rife

rife: If you say that something bad or unpleasant is rife somewhere, you mean that it is very common.

riposte

riposte: A riposte is a quick and clever reply that is often made in answer to criticism of some kind.

riveted

riveted: If you are riveted by something you are not able to stop looking at it because it is so very fascinating.

rotund

rotund: If someone is rotund, they have a round and fat body.

rubric

rubric: A rubric is a set of instructions at the beginning of a document, such as an examination or term paper, that is usually printed in a different style so as to highlight its importance.

ruminate

ruminate: If you ruminate on something, you think carefully and deeply about it over a long period of time.

sacrosanct

sacrosanct: Something that is sacrosanct is considered to be so important, special, or holy that no one is allowed to criticize, tamper with, or change it in any way.

sagacious

sagacious: A sagacious person is wise, intelligent, and has the ability to make good practical decisions.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 29, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

salient

salient: The salient qualities of an issue or feature are those that are most important and noticeable.

salubrious

salubrious: A salubrious place or area is pleasant, clean, healthy, and comfortable to live in.

salutary

salutary: A salutary experience can be unpleasant or difficult; nevertheless, it is useful for or of benefit to you because it strengthens your character.

sanctimonious

sanctimonious: Someone who is sanctimonious endeavors to show that they are morally superior to others.

sanction

sanction: A sanction is an official authorization or approval to do something, such as a showing of support or acceptance.

You checked "I Know This" on May 1, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

sanguine

sanguine: If you are sanguine about a situation, especially a difficult one, you are confident and cheerful that everything will work out the way you want it to.

sardonic

sardonic: Someone's sardonic smile, expression, or comment shows a lack of respect for what someone else has said or done; this occurs because the former thinks they are too important to consider or discuss such a supposedly trivial matter of the latter.

satiate

satiate: If something, such as food or drink, satiates you, it satisfies your need or desire so completely that you often feel that you have had too much.

satire

satire: Satire is a way of criticizing people or ideas in a humorous way through the use of exaggeration; it is often used to make people see their faults.

saturnine

saturnine: Someone who is saturnine is looking miserable and sad, sometimes in a threatening or unfriendly way.

savant

savant: A savant is a person who knows a lot about a subject, either via a lifetime of learning or by considerable natural ability.

schematic

schematic: A schematic diagram or picture shows the main parts of something in a simple drawing that helps people understand it.

schism

schism: A schism causes a group or organization to divide into two groups as a result of differences in their aims and beliefs.

scintillating

scintillating: A scintillating conversation, speech, or performance is brilliantly clever, interesting, and lively.

scrupulous

scrupulous: A scrupulous person takes great care to do everything in an extremely honest, conscientious, and fair manner.

scurrilous

scurrilous: Scurrilous accusations, stories, or articles contain untrue, unkind, and unfair statements about someone that could spoil that person's reputation.

sedentary

sedentary: Someone who has a sedentary habit, job, or lifestyle spends a lot of time sitting down without moving or exercising often.

sedition

sedition: Sedition is the act of encouraging people to disobey and oppose the government currently in power.

sedulous

sedulous: Someone who is sedulous works hard and performs tasks very carefully and thoroughly, not stopping their work until it is completely accomplished.

segue

segue: If a song, idea, or activity segues into another song, idea, or activity, it changes smoothly into it or is followed immediately by it without any stops or breaks.

semantic

semantic: The word semantic is used to describe that which pertains to meaning, especially the meaning of words and phrases.

semblance

semblance: A semblance is an outward appearance of what is wanted or expected but is not exactly as hoped for.

seminal

seminal: A seminal article, book, piece of music or other work has many new ideas; additionally, it has great influence on generating ideas for future work.

senescent

senescent: A senescent person is becoming old and showing the effects of getting older.

sententious

sententious: If someone is sententious, they are terse or brief in writing and speech; they also often use proverbs to appear morally upright and wise.

sentient

sentient: A sentient being is able to experience the world through its senses; it may have emotional feelings as well.

sepulcher

sepulcher: A sepulcher is a building or room, usually made of stone, in which dead people are buried.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 19, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

sequester

sequester: If you sequester someone, you keep them separate from other people.

serendipity

serendipity: Serendipity is the good fortune that some people encounter in finding or making interesting and valuable discoveries purely by luck.

serried

serried: Serried things or people are crowded together in rows with very little space separating them.

servile

servile: If you say that someone is servile, you don't respect them because they are too obedient, too agreeable, and too willing to do anything for another person.

shard

shard: Shards are sharp pieces of broken glass, pottery, metal, or other hard substances.

sidle

sidle: If you sidle, you walk slowly, cautiously and often sideways in a particular direction, usually because you do not want to be noticed.

simulacrum

simulacrum: A simulacrum is an image or representation of something that can be a true copy or may just have a vague similarity to it.

sinecure

sinecure: A sinecure is a paid job or position that provides a regular income but does not involve much work or responsibility.

sinister

sinister: Something sinister makes you feel that an evil, bad, or harmful thing is about to happen.

sinuous

sinuous: Something that is sinuous is shaped or moves like a snake, having many smooth twists and turns that can often be highly graceful.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 23, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

skeptic

skeptic: A skeptic is a person who doubts popular claims or facts about things that other people believe to be true.

skittish

skittish: Skittish persons or animals are made easily nervous or alarmed; they are likely to change behavior quickly and unpredictably.

slovenly

slovenly: A slovenly person is untidy or messy.

sobriquet

sobriquet: A sobriquet is a nickname, usually humorous, that people give to someone or something.

soiree

soiree: A soiree is a formal evening party held at someone's home.

sojourn

sojourn: To sojourn is to stay at a place that is not your home for a short amount of time.

solecism

solecism: If you commit a solecism, you make an error of some kind, such as one of a grammatical or social nature.

solicitous

solicitous: A person who is solicitous behaves in a way that shows great concern about someone's health, feelings, safety, etc.

soliloquy

soliloquy: A soliloquy is the act of speaking by a single person, usually an actor in the theater.

solvency

solvency: If an organization is in a state of solvency, it has enough money to pay its bills and other debts.

somatic

somatic: If you say that something is somatic, you mean that it relates to or affects the body and not the mind.

somnolent

somnolent: If you are somnolent, you are sleepy.

sonorous

sonorous: A sonorous sound is pleasantly full, strong, and rich.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 25, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

sophistry

sophistry: Sophistry is the clever use of arguments that seem correct but are in fact unsound and misleading, used with the intent to deceive people.

soporific

soporific: Something soporific makes you feel sleepy or drowsy.

spartan

spartan: A spartan lifestyle is very simple and severe; it has no luxuries or comforts.

specious

specious: Something that is specious seems to be good, sound, or correct but is actually wrong or fake.

sporadic

sporadic: Sporadic occurrences happen from time to time but not at constant or regular intervals.

spurious

spurious: A spurious statement is false because it is not based on sound thinking; therefore, it is not what it appears to be.

squalor

squalor: The word squalor describes very dirty and unpleasant conditions that people live or work in, usually due to poverty or neglect.

squander

squander: If you squander time, money, or other valuable resources, you use them wastefully and unwisely.

stasis

stasis: Stasis is a state of little change over a long period of time.

statutory

statutory: Something that is statutory is created and controlled by rules and laws; hence, it is legally punishable if violated.

steadfast

steadfast: If you are steadfast, you have a firm belief in your actions or opinions and refuse to give up or change them because you are certain that you are doing the right thing.

stigma

stigma: Something that has a stigma is not socially acceptable; therefore, it has a strong feeling of shame or disgrace attached to it.

You checked "I Know This" on Mar 21, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

stoic

stoic: A stoic person does not show their emotions and does not complain when bad things happen to them.

striation

striation: Striations are striped patterns or markings of parallel and narrow grooves.

stricture

stricture: A stricture is a rule or condition that imposes restrictions or limits on what you can do.

strident

strident: A strident person makes their feelings or opinions known in a forceful and strong way that often offends some people; not surprisingly, a strident voice is loud, harsh, and shrill.

stultify

stultify: When you are stultified by something, you lose interest in it because it is dull, boring, or time-consuming.

stupor

stupor: Stupor is a state in which someone's mind and senses are dulled; consequently, they are unable to think clearly or act normally, usually due to the use of alcohol or drugs.

stygian

stygian: A stygian place is extremely and unpleasantly dark, gloomy, and frightening.

stymie

stymie: Something that stymies you presents an obstacle that prevents you from doing what you need or want to do.

subjugate

subjugate: If someone subjugates a group of people or country, they conquer and bring it under control by force.

sublime

sublime: Something that is sublime is so strikingly beautiful that it seems not of this world; therefore, it affects the emotions deeply.

suborn

suborn: If you suborn someone, you persuade them to do something illegal, especially by giving them money to do so.

subservient

subservient: If you are subservient, you are too eager and willing to do what other people want and often put your own wishes aside.

substantive

substantive: Substantive issues are the most important, serious, and real issues of a subject.

subsume

subsume: If something is subsumed, it is included within a larger class or group as a member rather than being considered separately.

subterfuge

subterfuge: If you employ subterfuge, you use a secret plan or action to get what you want by outwardly doing one thing that cleverly hides your true intentions.

subvert

subvert: To subvert something, like a government, is to try to destroy or damage its power and influence; to subvert someone is to corrupt her morals, loyalty, or faith.

succinct

succinct: Something that is succinct is clearly and briefly explained without using any unnecessary words.

suffrage

suffrage: Suffrage is the right of people to vote in public elections.

suffuse

suffuse: If something, such as warmth, color, or liquid, suffuses a material, it gradually spreads through or covers it; if you are suffused with a feeling, you are full of that feeling.

sumptuous

sumptuous: Something that is sumptuous is impressive, grand, and very expensive.

sundry

sundry: Sundry people or things are all different from each other and cannot form a single group; nevertheless, they can be thought of as being together for the sake of ease, such as the various items in a garage.

superannuated

superannuated: Something that is superannuated is so old and worn out that it is no longer working or useful.

supercilious

supercilious: If you behave in a supercilious way, you act as if you were more important or better than everyone else.

superfluous

superfluous: Something that is superfluous is unnecessary; it is more than what is wanted or needed at the current time.

superimpose

superimpose: If two things are superimposed, one is stacked over the other so that both become one.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 29, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

supine

supine: If you are supine, you are lying on your back with your face upward.

supplant

supplant: To supplant someone is to replace them with someone else, usually because the latter is more powerful or better in some way.

supplicant

supplicant: A supplicant is someone who humbly and respectfully asks for something from another who is powerful enough to grant the request.

surfeit

surfeit: If you have a surfeit of something, you have much more than what you need.

surmount

surmount: If you surmount a problem or difficulty, you get the better of it by conquering or overcoming it.

surreal

surreal: A situation or experience that is surreal is so strange, so abnormal, or so disturbing that it seems like something from a dream.

surreptitious

surreptitious: A surreptitious deed is done secretly to avoid bringing any attention to it.

surrogate

surrogate: A surrogate is someone who temporarily takes the place of another person, usually acting as a representative because that person is not available to or cannot carry out a task.

svelte

svelte: A svelte person, most often a female, describes one who is attractive, slender, and possesses a graceful figure.

sybarite

sybarite: A sybarite is very fond of expensive and luxurious things; therefore, they are devoted to a life of pleasure.

sycophant

sycophant: Sycophants praise people in authority or those who have considerable influence in order to seek some favor from them in return.

sylvan

sylvan: The adjective sylvan describes things that are related to forests or trees.

symbiotic

symbiotic: A symbiotic relationship is one in which two organisms, organizations, or people intimately depend on each other, both acting to benefit the relationship.

symposium

symposium: A symposium is a formal meeting at which several experts or specialists deliver short talks or discuss a particular subject.

synergy

synergy: Synergy is the extra energy or additional effectiveness gained when two groups or organizations combine their efforts instead of working separately.

synoptic

synoptic: When you are presented with a synoptic view of a written work or subject, you receive a summary or general overview of the entirety of its contents.

tacit

tacit: A tacit agreement between two people is understood without having to use words to express it.

taciturn

taciturn: A taciturn person is quiet or silent by nature.

tactile

tactile: Something that is tactile can be physically touched.

taint

taint: To taint is to give an undesirable quality that damages a person's reputation or otherwise spoils something.

talisman

talisman: A talisman is an amulet or charm used for symbolic protection or good luck.

tamp

tamp: To tamp something is to pat it down gently and repeatedly until it is compressed tightly.

tangible

tangible: Something that is tangible is able to be touched and thus is considered real.

tantalize

tantalize: Something that is tantalizing is desirable and exciting; nevertheless, it may be out of reach, perhaps due to being too expensive.

tantamount

tantamount: If one thing is tantamount to another thing, it means that it is equivalent to the other.

tautology

tautology: When you employ a tautology, you needlessly and often unintentionally repeat a similar sense of one word when using other words to describe it, such as in the redundant phrases "free gift" or "usual custom."

tawdry

tawdry: Something that is tawdry, such as clothing or jewelry, is showy, tasteless, and usually cheap.

taxonomy

taxonomy: Taxonomy is the science of classifying plants and animals into an organized system.

tedium

tedium: If you are suffering from tedium, you are bored.

teetotaler

teetotaler: A teetotaler is one who does not drink alcohol.

temerity

temerity: To act with temerity is to act in a carelessly and irresponsibly bold way.

tempestuous

tempestuous: A tempestuous storm, temper, or crowd is violent, wild, and in an uproar.

temporal

temporal: Something that is temporal deals with the present and somewhat brief time of this world.

temporize

temporize: To temporize is to cause a delay in order to gain more time before making a final decision on something.

tenable

tenable: A tenable argument is able to be maintained or defended because there is sufficient evidence to support it.

tenacious

tenacious: When you are tenacious, you do not quit until you finish what you've started.

tendentious

tendentious: Someone who is tendentious is biased in their perceptions and opinions.

tenet

tenet: A tenet is a belief held by a group, organization, or person.

tensile

tensile: A tensile quality of something is its ability to be stretched or extended; it also pertains to its tension.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 29, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

tentative

tentative: To be tentative is to be hesitant or uncertain about something.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 17, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

tenuous

tenuous: Something tenuous is thin, weak, and unconvincing.

tepid

tepid: A tepid reaction to something is mild, unemotional, and lacking in enthusiasm; tepid water is likewise lukewarm: not too hot and not too cold.

terse

terse: To be terse in speech is to be short and to the point, often in an abrupt manner that may seem unfriendly.

tertiary

tertiary: Something or someone that is tertiary is third in rank.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 29, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

tether

tether: A tether is a restraint, such as a leash, rope, or chain, that holds something in place.

thematic

thematic: Something is thematic when it is related to a particular theme.

You checked "I Know This" on May 9, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

timorous

timorous: To be timorous is to be fearful.

tirade

tirade: A tirade is a prolonged, verbal outburst that severely criticizes someone or something.

titular

titular: If a person holds a titular position, they have a title but no real power.

tome

tome: A tome is a large weighty book that is usually of an important or scholarly nature.

toothsome

toothsome: Something is toothsome when it is tasty, attractive, or pleasing in some way; this adjective can apply to food, people, or objects.

topical

topical: The adjective topical describes something that is related to a topic or is of current interest.

torpor

torpor: If your body is affected by torpor, you are severely lacking in energy; therefore, you are idle—and can even be numb.

torsion

torsion: Torsion is the strain produced on a body by twisting it.

tortuous

tortuous: Something that is tortuous, such as a piece of writing, is long and complicated with many twists and turns in direction; a tortuous argument can be deceitful because it twists or turns the truth.

totalitarianism

totalitarianism: Totalitarianism is the political concept or principle that those in power should have complete control and all citizens should totally subject themselves to the state.

touchstone

touchstone: A touchstone is the standard or best example by which the value or quality of something else is judged.

traduce

traduce: If you traduce someone, you deliberately say hurtful and untrue things to damage their reputation.

trammel

trammel: When you trammel something or someone, you bring about limits to freedom or hinder movements or activities in some fashion.

transcendent

transcendent: Something that is transcendent not only surpasses all others in quality, achievement, or significance, but exceeds normal limits or boundaries.

transcribe

transcribe: If you transcribe something, such as a speech or other text, you write it or type it in full.

transfix

transfix: If something transfixes you, it surprises, interests, or shocks you so much that you are unable to move or think of anything else.

transfuse

transfuse: When something is transfused to another thing, it is given, put, or imparted to it; for example, you can transfuse blood or a love of reading from one person to another.

transgress

transgress: If someone transgresses something, he violates a boundary or limit, such as rules of social behavior or moral principles.

transience

transience: Something that has the quality of transience lasts for only a short time or is constantly changing.

transmogrify

transmogrify: If something is transmogrified, its form or shape is changed completely, especially in a funny or exaggerated way.

transmute

transmute: Something transmutes when it changes from one form or state into another.

transpose

transpose: If you transpose two things, you make them change places or reverse their normal order.

travail

travail: You refer to a situation or work as travail if it's very tiring, very unpleasant, or very difficult.

travesty

travesty: If you say that one thing is a travesty of a second thing, you mean that the first is an extremely bad, crude, or absurd version of the second.

treatise

treatise: A treatise is a formal written work that considers and examines a particular subject in a very systematic and extensive way.

tremulous

tremulous: Someone is tremulous when they are shaking slightly from nervousness or fear; they may also simply be afraid of something.

trenchant

trenchant: Trenchant comments or criticisms are expressed forcefully, directly, and clearly, even though they may be hurtful to the receiver.

trepidation

trepidation: Trepidation is fear or uneasiness about something that is going to happen.

triage

triage: Triage is a system for quickly determining where to assign available resources, such as manpower, medical supplies, and other necessities in emergency situations.

tribulation

tribulation: Severe problems, suffering, or difficulties experienced in a particular situation are all examples of tribulations.

trifle

trifle: If you refer to something as a trifle, you mean that it is of little or no importance or value.

triptych

triptych: A triptych is a painting or carving made of three related panels hinged together in such a way that the two side panels can be folded over the central one.

trite

trite: A trite remark or idea is so overused that it is no longer interesting or novel.

troglodyte

troglodyte: A troglodyte is reclusive, severely lacking in social skills, and is out of step with current times.

trope

trope: Tropes are expressions, phrases, or words that writers use as a clever method for expressing everyday ideas in a nonliteral and creative way.

truculent

truculent: A truculent person is bad-tempered, easily annoyed, and prone to arguing excessively.

truncate

truncate: If you truncate something, you make it shorter or quicker by removing or cutting off part of it.

You checked "I Know This" on May 5, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

tryst

tryst: A tryst is an appointment to meet at a specific time and place, made privately or secretly between two lovers.

tumultuous

tumultuous: A tumultuous event or period of time is filled with great excitement, confusion, or violence; a tumultuous reaction to something is likewise very loud and noisy because people are happy and excited.

turbid

turbid: Something that is turbid, such as water, is muddy or cloudy because it has lots of small pieces of matter or dirt in it.

turgid

turgid: Turgid writing or speech is excessively complicated, being filled with too many needlessly difficult words; consequently, such verbiage is boring and difficult to understand.

turpitude

turpitude: Turpitude is the state of engaging in immoral or evil activities.

tutelage

tutelage: To be under someone's tutelage is to be under their guidance and teaching.

tyro

tyro: A tyro has just begun learning something.

ubiquitous

ubiquitous: If something is ubiquitous, it seems to be everywhere.

ulterior

ulterior: When you have an ulterior motive, you have a hidden reason for doing something.

ultimatum

ultimatum: An ultimatum is a final statement or offer on an issue; for example, the phrase "Do this, or you can forget it!" is an example of an ultimatum.

umbrage

umbrage: When you take umbrage, you take offense at what another has done.

unadorned

unadorned: Something that is unadorned is not made more attractive with ornament or decoration.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 15, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

unalloyed

unalloyed: Something that is unalloyed is whole or complete; for example, unalloyed pain cannot be relieved.

unassuming

unassuming: Someone who is unassuming is not boastful or arrogant; rather, they are modest or humble.

unbridled

unbridled: A feeling that is unbridled is enthusiastic and unlimited in its expression.

uncharted

uncharted: Uncharted refers to something that has not been experienced before; it literally means that something has not been mapped out, and so remains an unknown.

unconscionable

unconscionable: An action or deed is unconscionable if it is excessively shameful, unfair, or unjust and its effects are more severe than is reasonable or acceptable.

uncouth

uncouth: To act in an uncouth manner is to be awkward and unmannerly.

unctuous

unctuous: An unctuous person acts in an overly deceptive manner that is obviously insincere because they want to convince you of something.

undulate

undulate: Something that undulates moves or is shaped like waves with gentle curves that smoothly rise and fall.

unfazed

unfazed: To be unfazed is to not be affected by something that happens to you, even if it is quite embarrassing or bothersome.

unfeasible

unfeasible: Something unfeasible cannot be made or achieved.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 15, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

unflagging

unflagging: If you are unflagging while doing a task, you are untiring when working upon it and do not stop until it is finished.

ungainly

ungainly: Someone who is ungainly is clumsy or awkward; something ungainly can be difficult to use, primarily because of its size or weight.

unguent

unguent: An unguent is a soothing salve.

unison

unison: Doing something in unison is doing it all together at one time.

unkempt

unkempt: An unkempt person or thing is untidy and has not been kept neat.

unlettered

unlettered: If someone is unlettered, they are illiterate, unable to read and write.

unobtrusive

unobtrusive: If someone acts in an unobtrusive way, their actions are not easily noticed and do not stand out in any way.

unprepossessing

unprepossessing: Something or someone that is unprepossessing is not impressive or is unattractive.

unremitting

unremitting: A thing or person that is unremitting is persistent and enduring in what is being done.

unrequited

unrequited: If you feel unrequited love for another, you love that person, but they don't love you in return.

unsavory

unsavory: If you describe something as unsavory, you mean that it is unpleasant or morally unacceptable.

unscathed

unscathed: To come out of something unscathed is to come out of it uninjured.

unseemly

unseemly: If you say someone's behavior is unseemly, you disapprove of it because it is not in good taste or not suitable for a particular situation.

unsullied

unsullied: Something that is unsullied is unstained and clean.

untoward

untoward: An untoward situation is something that is unfavorable, unfortunate, inappropriate, or troublesome.

urbane

urbane: If you behave in an urbane way, you are behaving in a polite, refined, and civilized fashion in social situations.

usurious

usurious: Usurious loans are made with a high interest rate.

usurp

usurp: When you usurp someone else's power, position, or role, you take it from them although you do not have the right to do so.

utilitarian

utilitarian: A utilitarian object is useful, serviceable, and practical—rather than fancy or unnecessary.

vacillate

vacillate: When someone vacillates, they go back and forth about a choice or opinion, unable to make a firm decision.

vacuous

vacuous: Something that is vacuous is empty or blank, such as a mind or stare.

vagary

vagary: A vagary is an unpredictable or unexpected change in action or behavior.

vantage

vantage: A vantage is a position, condition, or place that contains a powerful benefit, favored spot, or helpful aid of some kind.

vapid

vapid: Something vapid is dull, boring, and/or tiresome.

vaporous

vaporous: Something that is vaporous is not completely formed but foggy and misty; in the same vein, a vaporous idea is insubstantial and vague.

You checked "I Know This" on May 5, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

variegated

variegated: Something that is variegated has various tones or colors; it can also mean filled with variety.

vassal

vassal: In the Middle Ages, a vassal was a worker who served a lord in exchange for land to live upon; today you are a vassal if you serve another and are largely controlled by them.

vaunted

vaunted: Something that is vaunted, such as someone's ability, is too highly praised and boasted about.

vehement

vehement: When you have a vehement feeling about something, you feel very strongly or intensely about it.

venal

venal: Someone who is venal is dishonest, corrupt, and ready to do anything for money.

vendetta

vendetta: A vendetta is a prolonged situation in which one person or group tries to harm another person or group—and vice versa.

veneer

veneer: A veneer is a thin layer, such as a thin sheet of expensive wood over a cheaper type of wood that gives a false appearance of higher quality; a person can also put forth a false front or veneer.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 18, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

venerable

venerable: Venerable people command respect because they are old and wise.

venial

venial: A venial fault or mistake is not very serious; therefore, it can be forgiven or excused.

veracity

veracity: The veracity of something is its truthfulness.

verbatim

verbatim: If you repeat something verbatim, you use the same words that were spoken or written.

verbiage

verbiage: Verbiage is an excessive use of words to convey something that could be expressed using fewer words; it can also be the manner or style in which someone uses words.

verbose

verbose: Something that is verbose, such as a speech or article, contains too many words.

verdant

verdant: A place described as verdant is green because of all the plants and trees that grow there.

verisimilitude

verisimilitude: Verisimilitude is something's authenticity or appearance of being real or true.

verity

verity: The verity of something is the truth or reality of it.

vernacular

vernacular: A vernacular is the ordinary and everyday language spoken by people in a particular country or region that differs from the literary or standard written language of that area.

You checked "I Know This" on Jul 18, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT

vernal

vernal: Something that is vernal occurs in spring; since spring is the time when new plants start to grow, the adjective vernal can also be used to suggest youth and freshness.

vertigo

vertigo: Vertigo is the feeling of sickness and dizziness some people experience when looking down from a high place.

vestige

vestige: A vestige of something is a very small part that remains from a once larger whole.

vexing

vexing: If a problem or situation is vexing, it means that it puzzles, worries, or annoys you.

vibrant

vibrant: Something that is vibrant is lively and full of energy in a way that is exciting and attractive.

vicarious

vicarious: A vicarious pleasure or feeling is experienced by watching or reading about another person's doing something rather than by doing it yourself.

vicissitude

vicissitude: Vicissitudes can be unexpected or simply normal changes and variations that happen during the course of people's lives.

vigilant

vigilant: When you are vigilant, you are keenly watchful, careful, or attentive to a task or situation.

vignette

vignette: A vignette is a picture or a short description in a book that shows the typical features of a person or situation that it represents.

vilify

vilify: If you vilify people, you write or say bad things about them in an attempt to make them unpopular.

vindicate

vindicate: If a person is vindicated, their ideas, decisions, or actions—once considered wrong—are proved correct or not to be blamed.

virtuoso

virtuoso: A virtuoso is someone who is very skillful at something, especially playing a musical instrument.

virulent

virulent: A virulent disease is very dangerous and spreads very quickly.

visage

visage: Someone's visage is their face or the expression their face can make.

visceral

visceral: A visceral feeling or reaction is strong and difficult to control or ignore; it arises through instinct or "the gut" rather than through careful thought.

viscid

viscid: Something viscid is thick, sticky, and does not flow easily.

vitiate

vitiate: If someone vitiates something, they make it less effective, weaker, or reduced in quality.

vitriolic

vitriolic: Vitriolic words are bitter, unkind, and mean-spirited.

vituperative

vituperative: Vituperative remarks are full of hate, anger, and cruel criticism.

vivacious

vivacious: If someone is described as vivacious, they are lively and have a happy, lighthearted manner.

vociferous

vociferous: Someone who is vociferous expresses their opinions loudly and strongly because they want their views to be heard.

volatile

volatile: Something that is volatile can change easily and vary widely.

volition

volition: If you do something of your own volition, you choose to do it because you want to—not because you are forced to.

voluble

voluble: A voluble person can speak easily and their speech flows; voluble people also tend to be quite chatty.

voracious

voracious: A voracious person has a strong desire to want a lot of something, especially food.

vortex

vortex: A vortex is a force, such as a tornado or whirlpool, that draws things to its center and overwhelms anything caught within it.

vouch

vouch: To vouch is to assure the correctness of something or to give supporting evidence to indicate the truth of something.

wallow

wallow: To wallow in something is to immerse, roll, or absorb oneself lazily in it; wallow can also refer to being very involved in a negative feeling, such as wallowing in misery or self-pity.

wane

wane: If something—such as power, influence, or feeling—wanes, it gradually becomes weaker or less important, often so much so that it eventually disappears.

wangle

wangle: If you wangle something out of someone you manage to get it by cleverly persuading or tricking that person.

wanton

wanton: A wanton action deliberately harms someone or damages something for no apparent or good reason.

wastrel

wastrel: A wastrel is a lazy person who wastes time and money.

waver

waver: If you waver, you cannot decide between two things because you have serious doubts about which choice is better.

welter

welter: A welter of something is a large and confusing amount of it.

whet

whet: When something whets your appetite, it increases your desire for it, especially by giving you a little idea or pleasing hint of what it is like.

whimsical

whimsical: A whimsical idea or person is slightly strange, unusual, and amusing rather than serious and practical.

wile

wile: Wiles are clever tricks or cunning schemes that are used to persuade someone to do what you want.

winnow

winnow: If you winnow a list or group, you reduce its size by getting rid of the things that are no longer useful or by keeping only the desirable things.

winsome

winsome: Someone who is winsome is attractive and charming.

wistful

wistful: People who are wistful are rather sad because they want something but know that they cannot have it, especially something that they used to have in the past.

wizened

wizened: A wizened person is very old, shrunken with age, and has a lot of wrinkles on their skin.

woebegone

woebegone: Someone who is woebegone is very sad and filled with grief.

writ

writ: A writ is an official document that orders a person to do something.

yokel

yokel: A yokel is uneducated, naive, and unsophisticated; they do not know much about modern life or ideas because they sequester themselves in a rural setting.

zealous

zealous: Someone who is zealous spends a lot of time, energy, and effort to support something— notably that of a political or religious nature—because they believe in it very strongly.

zenith

zenith: The zenith of something is its highest, most powerful, or most successful point.

You checked "I Know This" on Apr 20, 2020 IST. Uncheck to undo.

IKT
